Actually, that book "the Russian origins of World War One" isn't that great. I think it was written so "cold warrior" types would eat it up while the rest would tune it out, if that makes sense. It has some interesting and true things, but it's missing a lot. And it's premise doesn't hold up to scrutiny either--you can't really blame any one country for the outbreak of the first world war. You can blame a small group of people in each of the belligerents though (including Russia, particularly Sazonov), and it's more interesting to look at the questionable decisions of those people and try to pick apart their motives.

I've been looking into this and found some better sources on the origins of World War One and the Russian civil war, which are intimately related:


------------


https://archive.org/stream/in.ernet.dli.2015.183514/2015.183514.The-Origin-Of-The-War-Of-1914-Vol-11_djvu.txt

The books by Albertini are a definitive source. Albertini traveled the world and interviewed a lot of the people responsible for the war or close to those responsible for the war. His interview with Artamanov, the Russian official in contact with the man who planned the assassination of Archduke Ferdinand (Dimitricvic or "Apis," the leader of the conspiratorial pan-Serbian organization "Black Hand"), is particularly interesting (an excerpt is provided her with some additional context:)


https://archive.org/stream/in.ernet.dli.2015.183514/2015.183514.The-Origin-Of-The-War-Of-1914-Vol-11_djvu.txt
>...Still to-day with such an abundance of witnesses and protagonists it is a difficult undertaking to reconstruct the exact lines of the tragedy, because most of them try to hide something or to elude some question or other. There are witnesses who attest something of which they have no knowledge, witnesses who remain dumb or give a false account of what they know, witnesses who add adornments to their statements or are mainly interested in self-justification. None the less by piecing together and sifting the information and impressions received, the present writer has come to an opinion on the origins of the conspiracy and the planning of the outrage which he believes to be substantially correct.

>Let us begin by ascertaining what happened after the outrage and the first results of the preliminary investigation. Together with bombs and revolvers the assassins had brought with them from Belgrade cyanide of potassium so that the one who carried out the deed should commit suicide and thus make sure of not betraying the names of the Other accomplices and above all the origins and instigators of the conspiracy. Obeying their instructions Cabrinovic and Princip swallowed their doses of poison, but it did not do more than cause slight injury to mouth and stomach. Cabrinovic was dragged out of the waters of the MiljaCka into which he had jumped after throwing the bomb and taken to the police first-aid post, where it was soon realized that he was an old acquaintance who had been banished from Sarajevo for five years for socialist opinions. 

>...In December 1937 in the presence of Colonel C. A. Popovid the present writer submitted the text of this interview to Colonel Simid and he confirmed that it was correct in all particulars except for certain formal details, but he assured the present writer that he had never stated that Hartwig knew everything, and that on this point his ideas had been wrongly reported. His opinion was that Hartwig was kept in the dark about the plot but that Artamonov — who sympathized with the Black Hand, to which he had contributed 8,000 francs, and above all with its Dimitrievic, with whom he was in daily co-operation — was fuUy informed of everything. Simid added that he had no idea whom Artamonov could have consulted in St. Petersburg before giving Dimitrievic his reply, but it must have been somebody of more authority than himself, possibly the Russian General Staff, possibly the War Minister Sukhomlinov, possibly some Grand Duke, certainly not Hartwig, because in that case there would not have been a delay of several days before he could give his answer. 

>The present writer does not know for what reason Simid altered his original version seeing that he had not troubled to rectify inaccuracies in his interview with Victor Serge as published in Clarté if inaccuracies there were. It must, however, be added that Giesl, the Austrian Minister at Belgrade, when questioned by the present writer, also replied that he did not believe Hartwig was cognizant of the plot.



https://archive.org/details/fallofthedynasti012755mbp
>...A tragic accident in Belgrade may have heightened the dangers that were inherent from the first in Berchtold’s recklessly calculated risk. On July 10, Baron Vladimir von Giesl, the Austrian Minister in Belgrade who had been recalled to Vienna for consultation, returned to his post. At 9 o’clock that evening he received an unexpected call from his Russian opposite number, the redoubtable Nicolas Henrikovitch de Hartwig. The Russian Minister said that he had come to express his condolences “for the atrocious outrage” (Sarajevo), but there were undoubtedly other things that he wanted to say. What they were we shall never know. At 9:20 P.M., just as Giesl was launching into a soothing—and quite false—interpretation of Austria’s attitude toward Serbia, Hartwig suddenly slumped to the floor, unconscious. He was dead when a doctor examined him a few minutes later (he was overweight, and had suffered from angina pectoris for some years). An unpleasant scene ensued after the arrival of Hartwig’s daughter, Ludmilla. She brusquely repulsed the sympathy expressed by the Giesls, and poked about the room, sniffing at an eau de cologne bottle, and rummaging in some large Japanese vases. Her father had smoked only his own Russian cigarettes, but Ludmilla had wrapped up the two butts and put them in her bag. Had her father had anything to eat or drink? she asked with unveiled suspicion. In the tense atmosphere of the time, public rumor immediately made a poisoner of the unfortunate Giesl, who was even accused of having brought back from Vienna an electric chair which instantly killed anyone sitting in it.

>Hartwig had inside knowledge of the Serbian Black Hand and its methods (the Austrians were strangely uninformed on the subject, though the alert French Minister in Belgrade had already been able to ferret out for his government the Black Hand’s role in the Sarajevo assassinations). As was noted in a previous chapter, he is believed to have broken off his originally close relationship with the fanatical brotherhood’s head, Colonel Apis, and in general, to have started putting the brakes on extreme Serbian nationalism, which he had earlier encouraged. His influence on the Serbian government was enormous; if his personal outlook on the Balkan problem had really changed as much as many historians think, his death at that crucial moment was undoubtedly a catastrophe for Europe. Giesl himself believed so. He later wrote that if Hartwig had lived beyond the “critical 25th of July,” the war would not have occurred.



https://archive.org/stream/in.ernet.dli.2015.183514/2015.183514.The-Origin-Of-The-War-Of-1914-Vol-11_djvu.txt
>...Knowing the military weakness of Serbia he was opposed to war between Austria and Serbia and to anything that might cause it. Giesl thought, however, that Artamonov may well have been privy to the plot. 

>Artamonov himself, who meanwhile had risen to be a general and in 1937 was living in Belgrade, assured the present writer in answer to an inquiry that from 19 June to 28 July 1914 he was not in Serbia, being on two months’ leave and his place being taken by Staff Captain Alexander Werchovski, an extremely able officer recently posted to Belgrade. Artamonov was at Zuridi when on 29 June he learnt of the outrage. He did not return to his post, but went first to Milan and then to Lovrana. There on 24 July he heard the news of the Austrian ultimatum to Serbia. He rushed to Fiume to telephone to Werchovski who, regarding war as inevitable, had already left for St. Petersburg. Then Artamonov decided to return to Belgrade arriving on 28 July the day of Austria’s declaration of war on Serbia. To Artamonov the present writer submitted Simid’s statements. 

>He declared them to be false and that Dimitrievic never mentioned the outrage to him. Only after the war did he learn that Apis was implicated. They had been on the friendliest terms but had never discussed the impending Austro-Hungarian manoeuvres in Bosnia-PIerzegovina or Francis Ferdinand’s visit to Bosnia. They had never exchanged ideas on what might happen if the Heir Apparent were to die. On the present writer’s remarking that it was strange he should absent himself from Belgrade at the very moment when the Austrian manoeuvres were on the point of beginning on the Bosnian frontier and the Archduke was expected at Sarajevo, Artamonov, after some embarrassed hesitation, said that he had not had any furlough for three years and permission had been given him in the first half of June when he had no idea of what was about to happen. He reiterated that he Knew nothing of the outrage, and that in the little Belgrade of the time, where public life was confined to a very few cafes, the plot could not have been kept secret, and he added: 

>>If Austria did not take adequate precautions for the protection of the Archduke’s life, there must have been reasons for it. Perhaps the Sarajevo drama implies a mysterious Hapsburg drama. Probably this is the explanation why Jovan Jovanovid’s approach to Bilinski had no result. 

>When the present writer asked Artamonov for his explanation of the statements made by Dimitrievic to Colonel Simid, his reply was: 

>>Perhaps Dragutin Dimitrievic gave this version to attenuate and cover up his own guilt or to boast of influences from high quarters. He was a strong, ambitious man who aimed at gaining complete and unconditional command of the State. His statements to Colonel Simid as to my having agreed to the Sarajevo outrage on one hand whitewashed him for his part in the plot and on the other enhanced his prestige. 

>The present writer must honestly say he remained unconvinced by the behaviour of this officer, who struck him as being of limited intelligence with little strength of character, or by his explanations for his absence from Belgrade even after the outrage. He showed the present writer his note book of June-July 1914, a bald list of Swiss and Italian hotels, giving the room-numbers of the accommodation occupied by himself and his family in each hotel and the account of the day’s expenses and nothing else. No mention of the Sarajevo outrage or Hartwig’s death. Only the top of the page bearing the date 24 July 1914, under the name of his hotel at Lovrana are the words : Austrian ultimatum to Serbia, followed by the usual record of the day’s expenditure beginning with: coffee — 2 lire


Albertini goes for both depth and breadth and his works fill multiple volumes. They are an essential reference for just about any topic on the war.


------------


https://books.google.com/books?id=2EyJY8uE4WYC&pg=443

http://jmss.org/jmss/index.php/jmss/article/view/420

In general, anything by Herwig on the origins of the war is really good. He goes over all the strange decisions and coincidences that led to the war.

Herwig convincingly argues against the thesis that the world "slid" into an inevitable World War I. Rather, the war was started by the efforts of a small group of officials in each of the belligerents:


>...Beyond continental Europe and the Ottoman Empire, tough, aggressive senior decision makers also charted the course toward war. In Japan, the European war brought relief and joy. What senior leaders termed the great "confusion" would spell opportunity for Japan, an opportunity to become the "chief nation of the Orient." On 8 August 1914, the cabinet approved Japanese participation in the war alongside Great Britain. That decision was the work primarily of one man, Foreign Minister Kato Takaaki. In what Frederick R. Dickinson describes as a "complete usurpation of the foreign policy prerogative," in August 1914, Kato, after consulting with just a handful of his closest advisors in the Foreign Ministry, took the genro, or elder statesmen, completely by surprise. 40 There was no input from the public, the popular press, or financial and industrial circles. And far from being a "slide" into war, Japan's entry into that conflict was the product of the machinations of its foreign minister.

>...Last but not least, the United States entered the war in April 1917 in large measure also because of one man: Woodrow Wilson. Having attempted for the first three years of the war to influence its course and outcome through diplomatic means, the president finally ran out of alternatives after Germany's initiation of unrestricted submarine warfare on 1 February 1917.

>John M. Cooper first examines, and then rejects, the customary arguments of scholars that "powerful forces" such as precedent, economics, culture, geopolitics, and popular opinion brought about the American decision to enter the war. He suggests instead that these "powerful forces" were but "background influences" and that they acted on the side of nonintervention. Rather, "Wilson remains at the center. He and, in certain critical respects, he alone cast America's lot for entry into World War I." With Congress out of session for all but three months between August 1914 and the end of 1915, the president acted on his own, with complete faith in his enormous self-assurance.

>...During the war, arguments of intention, of sinister premeditation were dominant, these basically being arguments of aggressive purpose. A year or two after the end of the war, a sea change occurred and arguments of inadvertence no one wanted war were given increasingly wide approval. Both arguments were basically political in character, serving as an aid first in the conduct of the war, and then in the conduct of the peace. Since little serious documentation was available at that point, the actual bases of the decision making were essentially unknown. The most striking instance of the shift in usages appears in the case of David Lloyd George, who, in a less than a year, changed from a committed intentionalist to become the principal author of the nonjudgmental slide thesis. In January 1920, he demanded that Kaiser Wilhelm II be formally tried as a war criminal, perhaps at Dover Castle. Then, in December of that year, he made a famous speech in which he argued that the nations had "glided, or rather staggered and stumbled" into war. 42 As late as 1936, Lloyd George still maintained, "No sovereign or leading statesman in any of the belligerent countries sought or desired war certainly not a European war.

>...And so it was in 1914. For decades, European leaders had "gamed" the likely scenario for war on the Continent. In each case, they rejected the notion that a war could be localized or isolated. In each case, they recognized the danger of diplomatic escalation leading to armed conflict. In each case, they knew the dangers inherent in a general European war. In each case, they accepted those risks and dangers in July and August, and they decided for war with the full expectation of winning and thereby solving the difficulties that prompted them to consider armed conflict in the first place. That is what made the July Crisis radically different from previous crises, such as the two Moroccan wars, the two Balkan wars, and the Tripolitanian war.

>...In fact, there was a surprising single-mindedness of purpose in the decision makers of 1914. They recognized almost to a man that the strategic argument of perceived decline or threat demanded the call to arms. In short order, the murder of Archduke Franz Ferdinand receded from the forefront of their considerations. Instead, the leaders in Vienna and Berlin, St. Petersburg and Paris, persisted in their view that war alone could resolve their perceived precarious positions in the European concert. And when two monarchs, Wilhelm II and Nicholas II, at the last moment tried to pull back from the precipice, the coteries in Berlin and St. Petersburg forced them back on course.

>...The "slide" thesis is also rendered spurious by the various actions, especially in the three critical capitals Vienna, Berlin, and St. Petersburg to block possible mediation of the crisis. Foreign Minister Berchtold as early as 3 July boldly informed the German ambassador, Heinrich von Tschirschky, of his government's need for a "final and fundamental reckoning" with Serbia. Kaiser Wilhelm II at Berlin endorsed that initiative with the terse marginalia, "now or never." Vienna refused a state funeral for Archduke Franz Ferdinand in part because such a formal gathering might have offered the crowned heads of Europe an opportunity to discuss and perhaps to coordinate their responses to the assassination at Sarajevo. Vienna was determined to strike out against Belgrade; Berlin seconded that initiative. And once Russia had decided to block the proposed Habsburg "punitive expedition" against Serbia by way of mobilization, Foreign Minister Sazonov forestalled further discussion and possible resolution of the crisis by instructing General Ianushkevich, the chief of the General Staff, to smash his telephone!

>Perhaps the last words on the "slide" thesis should go to one of the pivotal players, the chief of the German General Staff. Already in March 1913, General von Moltke confided to the Italian military attache Germany's intention to violate Belgian neutrality in case of war. The next war, Moltke stated, would be between France and Germany. In brutal terms, he allowed that this war would be "a question of life or death for us. We shall stop at nothing to gain our end. In the struggle for existence, one does not bother about the means one employs." 44 And in retirement in June 1915, Moltke in a private letter to Field Marshal Colmar von der Goltz spoke openly of "this war which I prepared and initiated." 45 No drift, no slide.

>...We suggest instead that a more intelligent reading of the events of July 1914 might have caused a different opinion as to whether the entire Balkans were worth the bones of millions of grenadiers Pomeranian or otherwise.


Again, the very idea of blaming any particular country as a whole for the war doesn't hold up to scrutiny; In most of the belligerent governments, one can find a tug-of-war of officials acting to start the war against officials acting to prevent it. Prince Lichnowsky in Germany and Georges Louis in France, for instance, both tried desperately to prevent the outbreak of war, and Lichnowsky's memoirs and Louis biography are worth a read.


------------


https://archive.org/details/fallofthedynasti012755mbp

Taylor's *Fall of Dynasties* is an indispensable overview of World War One, its origins, and its relation to the Russian Civil war. His overview of the Okhrana's operations in relation to World War I are illuminating and hard to find elsewhere.

Generally, Taylor avoids going into depth for most sub-topics (a necessity for the vast topic he covers), but the information he does provide often gives a deeper understanding of the political workings behind the war than most books provide. To give an example, his treatment of the Okhrana's (Tsarist secret police) relations with French President Poincaré is very helpful for understanding the disastrous military alliance between France and Russia that made World War I possible:


>...The infiltration of the police and the secret-service outlook into the higher policy-making levels of the Czarist state was no less evident in foreign than in domestic affairs. The Okhrana was particularly active in Paris, a major center of émigré revolutionary activities. It operated much as the GPU and the MVD were later to do. The chief agent was usually attached to the Russian Embassy with the rank of counselor; he rendered no accounts to the ambassador but was authorized to correspond with his chiefs through the diplomatic pouch. Co-operation between the Okhrana unit in Paris and the French Sureté was always close in the pre-war years. The Sureté helped one Okhrana official set up a special Franco-Russian organization, disguised as a private-detective agency, to spy on the émigrés. The Okhrana likewise organized, without protest from the French authorities, a French branch of the Russian “patriotic” organizations called the League for the Salvation of the Fatherland, which co-operated with French right-wing extremists like the Royalist Camelots du Roi.

>...To neutralize the chronic protest of French Socialists and Liberals against its operations on French soil, the Okhrana bribed French newspapers and journalists of the right who were willing to follow a pro-Russian line. According to an exposé of the Okhrana written in 1919 by one of its former senior officials, V. K. Agafonov, it financed a journalists’ club in Paris and paid regular subsidies to several important French newspapers, including the Echo de Paris, the Gaulois, and the Figaro. The last-named organ, according to Agafonov, for a while received 24,000 rubles—about $10,000—monthly from the Okhrana.

>When Izvolsky took over the Russian Embassy in Paris he promoted an arrangement with the French government for influencing French opinion that was more official, but hardly less conspiratorial, than the crude undercover operations of the Okhrana: the Russians would open a special credit, drawn upon the Czar’s secret funds, for the French government, which would then undertake to buy up the consciences—and the pens—of its own journalists in behalf of joint objectives. A letter sent by the Russian Prime Minister in October 1912 to his French opposite number—at that time Poincaré—pointed out one of the advantages of the proposed system: It would help keep within bounds “certain appetites and certain rivalries” in the French press which the Russians had learned from bitter experience were apt to be stirred up when they approached foreign journalists directly.

>There was another advantage that the Russian communication did not spell out but which Poincaré may have been able to read between the lines. Izvolsky looked upon the dry, little Lorrainer, with his implacable irredentism, as the heaven-sent instrument of Russian foreign policy in France—“If Poincaré were defeated it would be a catastrophe for us,” he warned St. Petersburg before the French presidential elections of 1913—and one of the secret objectives of the press campaign that Russia was proposing to finance was to combat the “pacifist”—we would say today “appeasement”—and therefore anti-Poincaré, elements in French public life. “Do not forget,” Izvolsky once wrote his nominal chief in St. Petersburg, “that Poincare has to struggle with very influential elements in his own party which are generally hostile to Russia and openly preach that France must not be dragged into any war arising out of Balkan affairs.”


Herwig also writes about how inexplicable the Poincaré government's decision-making was leading up to the war:


https://books.google.com/books?id=2EyJY8uE4WYC&pg=443
>The imperative of French policy in 1914, Eugenia C. Kiesling suggests, was simple and clear: to preserve the tie to St. Petersburg at all cost. France could not afford to "decide" whether to stand by Russia. While Premier Viviani publicly avowed that his policy was to "resolve the conflict ... in the interest of the general peace," he nevertheless described France as "entirely ready to support the action of the [Russian] imperial government. " France's ambassador to St. Petersburg, Paleologue, throughout the July Crisis counseled an aggressive stance on the part of France and Russia, including if need be recourse to war. On 25 July and again on 28 July, Paleologue assured Russian Foreign Minister Sazonov of "unequivocal French support." 25 Poincare's commitment to the Russian alliance was so firm that, in the words of one historian, he pursued it even at the cost of "connivance in dishonesty and blackmail."


Taylor's coverage of Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Sazonov's efforts to convince Tsar Nicholas to mobilize Russian forces during the July Days is likewise illuminating:



https://archive.org/details/fallofthedynasti012755mbp
>...Even before the sheer velocity of events became intolerable, the Russian Foreign Minister, Sazonov ... had committed a momentous blunder. After the Austrian ultimatum to Serbia he obtained the agreement of the Cabinet and the approval of the Czar to the principle of a partial mobilization of Russian forces—involving a little over 1,000,000 men—along the Austrian border. This move, Sazonov argued, might scare the Austrians out of attacking Serbia, but would not threaten Germany, and in any case a soothing note to Berlin would accompany public announcement of the call-up.

>...If the Czar had stuck to his refusal not to let Russian mobilization go beyond the limited call-up in the south, peace might have been saved (although the Russian Generals had already begun surreptitiously to exceed the terms of the Imperial ukase). But between 3 and 4 P.M. on July 30, just as Bethmann-Hollweg in Berlin was drafting new instructions to his Ambassador in Vienna advising him that Germany “must decline to be drawn wantonly into a world conflagration without having any regard paid to our counsels,” Nicholas’ vacillant will suddenly buckled.

>It was Sazonov who effected this fatal result. Accompanied by a staff officer, he came to the Peterhof Palace, some 17 miles out of the capital, to try to convince the Czar that general mobilization could no longer be delayed. For more than an hour, in deferential but urgent tones, he marshaled his arguments in favor of mobilization. He had two particularly strong ones: a somewhat vague report that Germany, too, had begun to mobilize, and the arrogant tone of the Kaiser’s latest telegram declaring that he could not mediate in Vienna if Russia went ahead with the partial mobilization against Austria.

>...“Think of the responsibility you are asking me to take if I follow your advice!” he finally exclaimed. “Think what it means to send thousands and thousands of men to their death.”

>Unluckily, Sazonov’s companion, General Tatishev, chose that moment to speak up.

>“Yes, it is a terrible decision to take,” he said.

>“I am the one who decides,” Nicholas snapped.

>From then on he seemed more attentive to Sazonov’s arguments. He was particularly impressed by the Foreign Minister’s view—an erroneous one we now know—that Germany was bent on war and would go ahead whether Russia mobilized or not. At last, after what seemed a terrible inner struggle, the Czar gave in.

>“All right, Serge Dimitrievitch,” he said, “telephone the Chief of the General Staff that I give the order for general mobilization.”


https://books.google.com/books?id=hU8lHfT4F5wC&pg=393
>...Mobilisation was ordered, and the tsar’s apparent decisiveness was rewarded with the support of the country’s socialists, while pacifst dissenters had no choice but to scatter into exile. The unity of the Russian people when faced by a national challenge would, it was hoped, expect a spiritual renewal and restore respect for the tsar. The immediate effect of the mobilisation, however, was merely to provoke Germany to respond in kind.


https://archive.org/details/fallofthedynasti012755mbp
>On August 1, at 7 P.M. Count Friedrich von Pourtales, the German Ambassador to Russia, red in the face and laboring under the nervous strain of a sleepless week, entered the office of Sazonov, whose amiable features were unusually taut. Rather brusquely the Germans asked whether the Russian government was disposed to give a satisfactory answer to the ultimatum presented by Germany the day before and timed to run out at noon. Receiving an evasive answer, he repeated his question, in a staccato voice. Once again Sazonov replied that the Russians could not demobilize, but that they were, as before, prepared to continue negotiations for a peaceful settlement. Both men were on their feet. The Count fumbled in his pocket and drew out the German declaration of war, which he read, breathing hard as he reached the final sentence:

>>“His Majesty the Emperor, my august sovereign, accepts the challenge in the name of the Empire and considers himself at war with Russia.”

>Then, losing all control of himself, he ran to the window which looked out over the Winter Palace reddened by the evening sun, and turning his back on Sazonov, burst into tears. Sazonov wordlessly patted his shoulder, whereupon Pourtales burst out, “Never did I think that I would have to leave St. Petersburg under such conditions.” The two diplomats, who were also old friends, embraced each other, in the Russian style, for the last time.


The whole book is recommended reading for anyone who wants to understand World War I.


------------



https://web.archive.org/web/20080921175641/https://odci.gov/library/center-for-the-study-of-intelligence/kent-csi/docs/v11i4a07p_0001.htm

Probably anything by Vladimir Burtsev on World War I and the Russian Revolution is good, if you can find it. What's more interesting is what he uncovered. Burtsev was a Russian revolutionary who devoted his work uncovering Okhrana spies who had infiltrated the revolution, all the way up to its leadership. He earned the name "the Sherlock Holmes of the Revolution" and essentially headed their counter-intelligence operations. He opposed Lenin and the Bolsheviks, especially later in the revolution, and uncovered that Roman Malinovksy, Lenin's right-hand man, was a spy for the Okhrana (a charge which Lenin tried to deflect).

The Okhrana claimed their spies infiltrated revolutionary organizations in order to influence them--either to discredit them or provoke them into committing crimes for which they could be turned over to law enforcement. As such, these "agent provocateurs" were a front-and-center problem for the revolution, and much is written about them by the revolutionaries. Communist and historian Bertram Wolfe writes of the extent of the Tsarist police's infiltration of the revolutionary movement:


https://archive.org/stream/in.ernet.dli.2015.276141/2015.276141.Three-Who_djvu.txt
>Though less ruthless and thorough in the suppression of opponents, and enormously less numerous than the GPU to which we have become accustomed, the Okhrana was second to no other secret political police of its day. Where peasant risings and mutinies gave it the pretext, it proclaimed martial law and used gallows and firing squad. In other provinces, it made use of the power of administrative deportation without trial, up to a maximum of five years in Siberia. But a roster of millions of prisoners in concentration camps would have seemed an incredible nightmare to this little band of routine-incrusted police officials. According to the testimony of its chief, Vasiliev, at the height of its power it never had more than one thousand secret agents in all Russia, nor more than one hundred in the capital. He complains that he had "very few” operatives abroad and, every time a congress was held in foreign parts, had to further debilitate his Moscow and Petersburg forces by sending some of his best agents. 

>But, with its years of political experience, the Okhrana sensed earlier than Lenin the nature of the new political situation, and prepared, too, to “go underground” once more. With forces that seem numerically so modest today, it now developed a system of espionage that eclipsed even the Zubatov and Gapon experiments. If, at every stage of our story so far we have found a police agent in the midst of each fairly numerous gathering, now we shall find them penetrating into the topmost secret hierarchies of the Social Revolutionary Party and the Bolshevik faction of the Social Democratic Party. 


In practice, however, the Okhrana often did more to hurt the Tsarist regime than protect it. The head of the Socialist Revolutionaries terrorist operations, Evno Azef, was uncovered by Burtsev as an Okhrana spy; at the same time, Azef was assassinating key Russian officials. Taylor does a good job of illustrating how hard Azef's actions would have been to explain to the rest of the Tsarist government:


https://archive.org/details/fallofthedynasti012755mbp
>The Okhrana’s relations with the out-and-out terrorist groups were no less equivocal than its relations with the Social Democrats. For many years the head of the Social Revolutionary assassination squads, a bearded, appropriately villainous-looking individual named Evno Azev, was the Okhrana’s star undercover agent Unquestionably he was strategically placed: the most formidable terrorist organization in Russia could not plan a murder without the Okhrana receiving warning in advance. There was, of course, one slight drawback to the arrangement: if Azev were not allowed a reasonable quota of assassinations his professional reputation might suffer, and eventually the terrorists would replace him with a more efficient and reliable killer. On the other hand there was a feeling in some police circles that Azev had been allowed perhaps a little too much scope when in 1904 he helped plan the murder of his own employer, Minister of the Interior V. K. Plehve; the feeling grew sharper the following year when Azev’s associates blew up the Czar’s uncle, Grand Duke Serge in Moscow. Strictly speaking, Azev was not to blame for this outrage; he had reported it in good time for preventing it, but the Okhrana, apparently fearing to expose a useful agent by being too explicit, had passed on to the local authorities a warning, so vague as to be worthless.

>When Azev later reported a plot to assassinate the Czar himself, General Guerassimov decided that to avoid any further slips he would personally take over the management of his talented but redoubtable agent Thanks to this high-level supervision the plot was eventually foiled without damage either to the Czar or to Azev. Eventually Azev was exposed, but he was never brought to justice. When the scandal became serious the Okhrana helped him to escape abroad, where he remained in genteel retirement until his death in 1918.


Other "agent provocateurs" would organize worker's strikes and protests against the Tsar:


https://archive.org/details/fallofthedynasti012755mbp
>On occasion the Okhrana organized escapes and prison breaks to build the “cover” of its agents, and though it clung to the fiction that these were merely passive informants, many of them were agents provocateurs in the most literal sense. Though the investigating committee set up under the Kerensky regime could not find documentary proof that the Okhrana had deliberately instigated street demonstrations and rebellions, there is a wealth of informed testimony that it did so, notably in the great Moscow uprising of 1905 and in similar bloody disorders in Kronstadt and Viborg.


One of the most famous of these, the 1905 protests at the Winter Palace calling for better working conditions and an end to the Russo-Japanese war, was led and organized by another police agent, Father Gapon. The imperial guard and uniformed police attacked and killed hundreds of the protesters as Gapon fled, a massacre that essentially constituted police agents leading civilians to be slaughtered by other police. At best, the "Bloody Sunday" massacre represented an egregious failure to communicate among the Tsarist intelligence, police and military. Whatever the cause, the Okhrana's actions further galvanized public opinion against the Tsar.

The Bloody Sunday massacre is part of a larger pattern of police provocations that tended to energize revolutionary movements and turn public opinion against the Russian monarchy. In the late 19th century the Okhrana funded the *People's Will*, the magazine of the radical Russian terrorist organization with the same name. During the Russian revolution, the Okhrana funded *Pravda*, the mouthpiece of the Bolsheviks, and at the time of its founding employed multiple agents among its editorial staff. Both of these publications encouraged revolutionary violence and extremism, as did the speeches of Malinovksy, which he would send to the Okhrana for approval before delivering them to the Duma--a fact often cited to illustrate the Okhrana's duplicity. Tsarist *provocateurs* also made it their priority to aide the Bolsheviks over other revolutionary organizations, a strategy which Okhrana officials claimed would divide the Russian revolutionaries so they could be more easily controlled and discredited.

What exactly these *provocateurs* were thinking constitute some of the greatest mysteries of the Russian revolution, and Burtsev's detective work often uncovered more mysteries than he solved. Azef's assassination of Plehve, for instance, allowed Pyotr Sviatopolk-Mirsky to take over as Minister of the Interior and paved the way for Bloody Sunday, and Azef would go on to assassinate Gapon a little over a year after the massacre. Burtsev's unmasking of Dr. Zhitomirsky, another Okhrana agent and close confident of Lenin, likewise raised more questions than answers, particularly regarding Lenin's handling of the matter:


https://archive.org/stream/in.ernet.dli.2015.276141/2015.276141.Three-Who_djvu.txt
>...If we were to list only the more important spies that had so far entered intimately into the life of Vladimir Ilyich, that list would include Gurovich, who financed the first legal Marxist organ, Nachalo , with police funds; the surgeon dentist N. N. Mikhailov, who turned in Ulyanov, Martov and the other organizers of the underground League for Struggle at the end of 1895; Dr. Jacob Zhitomirsky, who, as Lenin’s confidential agent in Berlin, made the arrangements for Kamo and his case of dynamite, for Krassin’s counterfeit banknote paper, and for Litvinov’s and other arrests in connection with the disposal of the five-hundred-ruble notes of the Tiflis holdup. So well did he work that Lenin continued to consider him as a “man of confidence,” to be used for the most delicate tasks. After the Berlin arrests, Zhitomirsky moved “for safety” to France, whence he visited Geneva in 1909 to urge Vladimir Ilyich to move to Paris, “a large city where there will be less spying.” Writes Krupskaya: “The argument was convincing to Ilyich.” Thus the shadowed moved in order to be closer to his shadow. 

>In 1911, Zhitomirsky finally fell under suspicion, but it was not his chief who suspected him. Lenin received a warning from Vladimir Burtsev. Now warnings from Burtsev were no small matter, for he was a self-constituted, one-man, counter-espionage agency. As some collect coins or stamps orieminine conquests, he collected spies. He it was who had shortly before exposed the incomparable Azev, director of the Fighting Section of the Social Revolutionary Party. Yet so sure was Lenin of his most trusted agent that he ignored the warning. 

>A revolutionary bloodhound by vocation, Burtsev, once he had scented a spy, was not to be put off the trail. By 1913 he had gathered so much evidence that he sent Lenin an ultimatum. He would create a public scandal if trust were not withdrawn from this man. “If my charges are false, let him haul me before a revolutionary tribunal. There he will prove his innocence or I my charges.” 

>Alarmed at last, Lenin sent another “man of confidence” to take up the Zhitomirsky matter with Burtsev, and, at the same time, to discuss the whole problem of combatting the spies with which the Bolshevik movement was now obviously infested. The man whom Lenin sent was Roman Malinovsky! 

>Malinovsky questioned Burtsev with strained interest. Who in the police or the government was giving him his secret tips? what reasons had he for suspecting Dr. Zhitomirsky? how could the Bolsheviks judge the reliability of such grave charges unless they were given the sources? what other Bolsheviks did he suspect? Insistently, Malinovsky pleaded that Burtsev communicate “in strict confidence” his sources in the government.


Burtsev's detective work (often aided by outside tips, anonymous or otherwise) resulted in the discovery of hundreds of police informers and *provocateurs* among the revolutionaries' ranks. Of course, these are only the agents we know about; trying to pick-apart exactly who was working for the Tsarist police, the Bolsheviks, or both, and what their motives were is perhaps the most fascinating and important task in understanding the Russian Revolution and, arguably, World War I as a whole.

Burtsev can often be found near the center of such intrigues. When General Kornilov staged a coup against the Russian provisional government (the infamous "Kornilov affair"), Kerensky, then the head of the provisional government, called on the Bolsheviks for support and provided them with arms, setting the stage for Bolsheviks' own coup a few months later. Burtsev, however, uncovered that Kornilov had acted with the full knowledge and agreement of Kerensky (a charge Kerensky would spend some time disputing in his memoirs).

Burtsev developed a reputation as a meticulous and feared investigator, and this reputation alone could drag potentially unscrupulous actors into unwanted scrutiny. After the provisional government replaced the Tsar, Burtsev was tasked with inspecting the police archives of the old regime. Kerensky, however, opposed Burtsev's appointment and sought to replace him, despite Burtsev's reputation as the premier expert in the crimes of the Tsarist secret police. As the historian Robert Henderson writes:


>The liberal-patriotic weekly Petrograd Gazette, for example, splashed his portrait over a whole page under the banner headline: ‘Unmasker of Secret Police and Provocateurs’, with the following brief report: ‘V. L. Burtsev, the famous writer and political activist, is renowned for exposing the Azefovshchina so zealously cultivated by Stolypin. Currently, by order of the Provisional Government, Burtsev is systematizing the affairs of the secret police, the Gendarmerie, and the Department of the Police.’ And indeed, with every passing day, the Komissiia Burtseva (Burtsev Commission), as it became known, would emerge from its labours in the archives with the scalp of yet another traitorous revolutionary, student or journalist. But evidently, such successes did not find favour with Kerensky, the new Minister of Justice, who called Burtsev’s reliability into question believing he was simply not cut out for such systematic duties. Within three days of his appointment, Kerensky was already attempting to undermine the new commissioner, writing to Burtsev’s former co-editor Pavel Shchegolev and others, asking them to bypass Burtsev, examine the Department of Police documents themselves and report back directly to Kerensky. Indeed, according to Sergei Svatikov, both Kerensky and Shchegolev attempted to prevent Burtsev from gaining access to the police archives.

>...The commission managed to limp on for another three months until mid-June, when Kerensky succeeded in having it replaced by another body under Shchegolev’s official chairmanship.


(It should be noted that Henderson's biography of Burtsev is a good reference but more biased than a history book should be--Henderson spends too much ink and paper comparing Burtsev to Don Quixote, but it is the opinion of the author that if you are reading Burtsev's works now, his efforts were far from being in vain.)

Kerensky formally liquidated the "Burtsev Commission" in March 1917, and Burtsev's work remains much of what we know about the Okhrana's operations during World War I:


https://translate.google.com/translate?sl=ru&tl=en&js=y&prev=_t&hl=en&ie=UTF-8&u=http%3A%2F%2Fwww.universalinternetlibrary.ru%2Fbook%2F70296%2Fchitat_knigu.shtml&edit-text=&act=url
>At the end of February - beginning of March 1917, almost simultaneously throughout Russia, fires burned, in which the documents of the Security Departments, the Gendarmerie Directorates, the Police Department and other services of the Ministry of the Interior of the Empire burned. The flame was absorbing priceless documents.

>In the first days of the February Revolution, enraged crowds of metropolitan residents set fire to the District Court building on Liteiny Prospekt and the old prison, the Lithuanian Castle, near the Theater Square. They burned to the ground. The fires broke out in the building of the Police Department on the Fontanka near the Panteleymonovsky Bridge and on Mytninskaya Embankment, where the Petrograd Security Department was smashed and burned. These two buildings with their contents were set on fire intentionally. Many wanted to exterminate the archives of the Security Department and the Special Department of the Police Department, they needed oblivion of the past as a guarantee of future existence.

>"True, here and there the gendarmerie officers managed to destroy lists of provocateurs," wrote the publicist SG Svatikov, "in some places a crowd, instigated by security agents, did not understand the meaning of what was happening, defeated the Security Departments and burned their archives and records. For example, a significant part of the archives of the Petrograd security department perished".

>All those who left memories of these strange fires of the spring of 1917 believed that their former guards had organized them.

>"Before the building of the Police Department," wrote the well-known archivist V. Maksakov, "huge fires of papers, documents, deeds, photographic cards thrown from the windows burned day and night on the Fontanka and Panteleymonovskaya street. In the room most of the cabinets were hacked, and books, files, individual papers piles covered the floors of a huge building. Some departments, for example, VIII office work, which dealt with cases of combating crime, were completely destroyed. Others suffered considerably. Fortunately, the room in which the Special Section of the Police Department was located did not suffer much. Here were the most valuable materials in the historical sense. They have been preserved almost completely ".

>Someone reported on what was happening on the Fontanka in the Pushkin House of the Academy of Sciences. The indispensable secretary of the Academy of Sciences, Academician SF Oldenburg, was able to obtain several wagons, and an expedition consisting of PE Shchegolev, BL Modzalevsky, tl. A. Kotlyarevsky, A. S. Polyakov, A. A. Shilov, V. P. Semennikov and others, went to save the most valuable archives. All that was saved, on March 3, was loaded into a sleigh and taken to the Vasilievsky Island to the Academy of Sciences. (Some of the saved documents were lost in 1918 when the archives were evacuated to Yaroslavl.)

>In Moscow on March 1, 1917 in the palace along Gnezdnikovsky Lane, 5, bonfires flamed. Documents of the Security Department were burning. Someone wore papers in the bonfires, someone took for a folder, photos, brochures. "It was difficult to understand," wrote Maksakov, "who was more in this crowd," curious or former guards who aspired, as late as possible, to conceal in the fire of fires their traces of participation in the protection of the failed autocratic system. That there were a lot of former guards in the crowd could be seen from the fact that when checking the cases of the "secret police", especially its so-called "secret service department," it was subsequently found out that the lack of mainly personal files of secret employees, "agent notes" such documents, apparently, not accidentally disappeared during the "spontaneous" rout of the "secret police" and police stations.

>On the same day, a group of politicians and historians organized the protection of the documents of the "secret police" and their transportation to Red Square to the Moscow Historical Museum, where the reading room of the museum was adapted to accommodate archival materials ".

>The situation was much worse in the provinces. There, the security offices burned simultaneously with the capital, first of all they destroyed personal affairs of secret employees and normative documents regulating the methods of the political investigation. News of the widespread destruction of the detective institutions of the former empire prompted the Provisional Government to urgently establish a Commission under the Ministry of Justice to liquidate the political affairs of the former Police Department. It was headed by the former Narodovolets VL Burtsev, who paid very little time to the Commission, which left part of the archives in the custody of their former custodians, officials of the Ministry of Internal Affairs. The Provisional Government "ordered the protection of police archives only when the official custodians left their posts and when many documents had already been plundered and destroyed".

>Seeing that the Burtsov Commission is inactive, on March 13, 1917, the Minister of Justice signed a letter with the following content:

>"I propose to Comrade Prosecutor Sluchevsky, PE Shchegolev, VM Zenzinov, NN Myasoyedov and Ensign Znamensky to review in the shortest possible time the documents seized in the Police Department and other institutions at my disposal and the results inform me.

>Minister of Justice AF Kerensky ".


Burtsev's investigations extended beyond the Russian revolution. It was he who uncovered the famous "Willy Nicky telegrams" (https://wwi.lib.byu.edu/index.php/The_Willy-Nicky_Telegrams), shattering the Bolshevik propaganda narrative that it was the monarchs who started the war (historians like Albertini and Herwig would later show the war was started by small group of officials in each belligerent state, with their respective monarchs generally being strung along). And it was he who unmasked the French socialite Arkadiy Harting as a "miserable little provocateur" (in the words of historian Ben Fischer) for the Okhrana, a blow from which the Paris Okhrana never recovered. Nor could Harting's case officer, Pytor Rachkovsky, escape the snare of Burtsev's meticulous investigations; following the war, Burtsev uncovered that Rachkovsky, who's Paris intrigues helped secure the disastrous Franco-Russian military alliance that made World War I such a bloody mess, also forged *The Protocols of the Elders of Zion*, a conspiratorial text that blamed the war on a secretive cabal of Jews, who were subject to rampant and sometimes violent antisemitism at the time and often blamed for society's ills.

After the war, Burtsev devoted his remaining years to countering Nazi propaganda.


------------


https://archive.org/stream/Germany-and-Revolution-in-Russia-1915-1918/GermanyAndRevolutionInRussia1915-1918-DocumentsFromArchivesOfGermanForeignMinistry_djvu.txt

The German government's support for the Russian revolution are a huge piece of the puzzle of understanding World War I, and the the archives of the German Foreign Ministry's communications regarding this support are one of the best primary sources available. From the start, the German High Command, the Foreign Ministry, and Chancellor Hollweg (who was in close contact with the Foreign Ministry) showed that they knew Germany had slim chances to win the war, even as many of them acted to start it:


https://books.google.com/books?id=nAFfAr3dU_8C&pg=PA79&lpg=PA79
>The press and popular feeling played on the inevitability of a clash between Teuton and Slav. This emotive vocabulary did not seem inappropriate given the reality of the position. The Russian army's budget--independently of the extraordinary capital grants--had grown from 406 million roubles in 1907/8 to 581 million in 1913/14. Spending on the navy nearly tripled over the same period, and in 1914 exceeded that of Germany. In 1913 the Russians introduced the 'grand programme', enacted in 1914, which aimed to increase the annual contingent of recruits for the army from 455,000 to 585,000, and to expand the total number of divisions from 114.5 to 112.5. The Russian war minister accompanied these enlargements with statements calculated to stoke German anxieties. The German and Austro-Hungarian armies were already inferior to those of France and Russia by over a million men in the sumer of 1914; by 1917 the Russian army alone would be three times the Size of Germany's. The argument that, objectively, there was no chance of a Russian challenge in economic terms did not figure in the calculations on the military balance. By 1914 French loans had enabled the construction of strategic railways so that Russia's mobilization could be accelerated, and the first troops be into battle within fifteen days. German plans drawn up on 1905 rested on the then-valid assumption that Germany would have six weeks in which to deal with France before turning east: the very existence of that planning assumption, which by 1913 was demonstrably wrong, added to Germany's sense of panic. In may 1914, therefore, Moltke's advocacy of a preventative war took on greater urgency, if not more precision: 'we must wage a preventative war', he told Gottlieb von Jagow, the foreign minister, 'to conquer our opponents as long as we still have a reasonable chance in this struggle.'

>Both Jagow and Bethmann Hollweg resisted Moltke's suggestion. But the case for doing so seemed, in the self-absorbed atmosphere of Wilhelmine politics, to be growing weaker. As early as December 1912 Bethmann--who had visited Russia in that year--confessed: 'One must have a good deal of trust in God and count on the Russian revolution as an ally in order to be able to sleep at all.'


The unfurling of this risky strategy of "counting on the Russian revolution," as Hollweg put it, can be seen in the archives of the German Foreign Ministry. After the battle of Marne, German leadership predicated that it was only a matter of time before the Russian military would overwhelm Germany on the Eastern front. Germany, at best, would be forced to end the war on unfavorable terms. To prevent this, German leadership hoped to secure a peace treaty with Russia separate from the Entente (a "separate peace"), or at least--from reading between the lines for some of the Foreign Ministry's communications--to destabilize Russia enough internally that their external military might would falter.

Such was the impetus for the Foreign Ministry to support Lenin and his Bolsheviks:


https://archive.org/stream/Germany-and-Revolution-in-Russia-1915-1918/GermanyAndRevolutionInRussia1915-1918-DocumentsFromArchivesOfGermanForeignMinistry_djvu.txt
>The Austro-Hungarian Foreign Minister to the Chancellor 

>Vienna, 10 November 1917 

>...Lenin could then easily make advances towards a separate peace with us within the terms of his programme, and could proceed to the conclusion of an armistice. Since the Maximalists' programme includes the concession of the right to self-determination of the non-Russian peoples of Russia, the question of what should finally be done with Congress Poland, Courland, Livonia, and Finland could well be left to be decided in the course of peace negotiations. It would be our business to ensure that the desire for separation from Russia and for political and economic dependence on the Central Powers be voiced from within these nations. In view of what I have said, I therefore believe that we could influence the development of the situation in Russia favourably to our aims


https://archive.org/stream/Germany-and-Revolution-in-Russia-1915-1918/GermanyAndRevolutionInRussia1915-1918-DocumentsFromArchivesOfGermanForeignMinistry_djvu.txt
>The Minister in Stockholm to the Foreign Ministry

>2 May 1917

>Herr von Heidenstam considers that report is very likely true, as both the political line Lenin is pursuing and his peace propaganda are completely independent, and he is thus now in a position of violent opposition to the government. According to a report received today from the Telegram Bureau, he has been summoned before the Workers' Council for this reason. 

>There have been large demonstrations in favour of peace, led by students, in front of Kazan cathedral, at which violent speeches were made against England and the United States, and more moderate ones against France. The assassination of General Katshalinski is considered significant because he was a spokesman of the new government. 

>Anarchy is on the increase. Lucius 


Lenin and Bolshevik propaganda openly declared their opposition to the war, distaste for France and England, and desire to violently overthrow the Tsarist government. Lenin, then, appeared to be the perfect tool for the panicked German leadership--should the Bolsheviks seize power, Lenin would face tremendous political pressure to fulfill his promises to quickly end the war, which was deeply unpopular with the Russian people. And even if the Bolsheviks failed to overthrow the Russian government, the attempt alone would have a destabilizing effect, surely aided by the Bolsheviks' extremist anti-war and anti-Entente propaganda. Whether this was a wise plan or not, the Foreign Ministry pursued it eagerly. According to Der Speigel:


https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=de&u=http://www.spiegel.de/spiegel/spiegelspecialgeschichte/d-54841257.html&prev=search
>... For four years Berlin supported the Bolsheviks and other revolutionaries in Russia with [money], ammunition, and weapons, thereby contributing to the end of the tsar monarchy. The German Foreign Office alone spent at least 26 million marks, according to today's value of around 75 million euros, by the end of 1917.

>...Thus a money-boom went down to the numerous political adventurers who reported themselves to the German authorities after the outbreak of war. Supposed and actual tsarist adversaries boasted that they could incite mutiny on the Russian Black Sea Fleet, provoke uprisings in the Ukraine, or stir up social unrest.

>It was a lucrative business also for possible braggers. For a "general revolution against Russia", the Foreign Office paid in September 1914 to two men of "great influence" 50,000 marks in gold. Another 2 million in cash should follow at the insurrection - until today no one knows who received the funds. Later the premiums even rose; German diplomats and secret service agents offered millions for a rebellion in a single government of the Tsar empire alone. 

>...Among historians there is broad agreement that it was easier for the Bolsheviks to overthrow the rotten Provisional Government than to assert the power and to enforce it throughout Russia. The state administration collapsed after the October Revolution, but there was a shortage of all necessities: grain, coal, clothing. In northern Russia, also in Siberia and in the southern parts of the former czar empire, opponents of the new regime were gathering. Soon the once great power of Anarchy and the Civil War sank.

>The imperial empire under William II, on the one hand, contributed to the chaos, for German troops occupied considerable parts of the former tzar empire. But at the same time the diplomats of His Majesty invested millions to keep the Bolsheviks in Central Russia in power, because only these were ready to accept a German victory-peace, and because no one in Berlin believed that a real socialism would come to its feet.

>"The Bolsheviks are great fellows, and have made everything very beautiful and well done so far," wrote Diplomat Kurt Riezler, who at that time decisively determined the German policy on Russia.

>It is unlikely to be clear how much money the imperial Germany at the end of 1917 gave the Bolsheviks. There was no doubt that there were considerable amounts. In the archive of the Federal Foreign Office you can find an amazing document. On November 25, 1917, the Foreign Minister's liaison officer telegraphed to Berlin at the headquarters in Bad Kreuznach:

>>"The current Petersburg government is struggling with great difficulties, banks denying it any financial support that their government needs urgently to obtain the food for the people and the army ... Is it possible for her to meet the urgently needed money of the difficulties and her slogan in the people and the army, it will be able to hold itself until the armistice is closed, which is what Lenin has recognized, so he turns to us ... Supreme Army leadership considers it highly desirable if the Lenin government succeeds in making money. "

>The Federal Foreign Office backed out: "Further financial support for the Bolsheviks is needed." A few days later, Riezler maintained that the Bolsheviks "now have money". 


Through the Bolshevik agent Helphand (also known as Parvus) and other intermediaries, the Foreign Ministry provided the Bolsheviks with funds and at various points helped distribute their propaganda. Germany secured transport to Russia for numerous Russian revolutionaries in exile, including, famously, Lenin himself, a decision that went to the highest levels of the German government--including Chancellor Hollweg and General von Ludendorff.

It's worthwhile to note that while Germany's situation in 1915 made supporting the Bolshevik revolution appear to be their only option, funding from a hostile foreign country might have truly been the Bolshevik's only option to support their movement. The Bolsheviks were not especially popular in Russia (or abroad), and for obvious reasons would have had difficulties taking funds from the wealthy Russian elite. This point was not lost on the German Foreign Ministry:


https://archive.org/stream/Germany-and-Revolution-in-Russia-1915-1918/GermanyAndRevolutionInRussia1915-1918-DocumentsFromArchivesOfGermanForeignMinistry_djvu.txt
>The Minister in Copenhagen to the Chancellor 
>
>21 December 1915 
>
>Dr. Helphand, who returned from Berlin yesterday, visited me today and gave me his report on the results of his journey. He emphasized that he had been extremely civilly received in all the most important government offices, and that he had been given the definite impression that his suggestions had found approval with authoritative circles, both in the Foreign Ministry and in the Treasury.
>
>...Dr. Helphand continued by saying that about 20 million roubles would be required to get the Russian revolution completely organized. This total could not possibly be distributed at once, as there would then be a danger of its source being discovered. However, in view of the fact that the beginning of the action was imminent, he had suggested at the Foreign Ministry that the sum of one million roubles should at once be put at the disposal of his confidential agent. This confidential agent entirely shared his view that the revolution would be set in motion about 9-22 January and that, even if it did not immediately take hold of the whole country, it would certainly prevent any return to stable conditions from taking place. In 1905 the bourgeois parties had supported the revolution and had voluntarily paid the wages of the striking workers. Now, however, the bourgeoisie was unfavourable to the movement and the revolutionary committee was therefore forced to bear the entire cost.


The Foreign Ministry apparently failed to realize, however, that such an arrangement created an incentive for the Bolsheviks to prolong the war--at Germany's expense, of course. Should the war have ended in a quick general peace, the Bolshevik's funding, and so their revolution, would have been cut short. On top of that, Russian frustration with their government increased with weariness with the war, driving more citizens to revolutionary organizations like the Bolsheviks. Accordingly, Lenin opposed the Stockholm Conference (https://books.google.com/books?id=vSHuCgAAQBAJ&pg=PA514&lpg=PA514
, https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/aug/17bcca.htm), an international socialist effort to end the war without annexations or indemnities, and there are some indications that well-placed agents with Bolshevik sympathies in Russia and abroad acted to prolong the war in more subtle ways.

As the German leadership's dreams of a sympathetic Bolshevik regime in Russia grew more bold, it may have been that Lenin's very existence helped to prolong the war--after all, if German officials believed they were about to turn a two front war into a one front war with the Bolshevik revolution, why bother negotiating for a general peace before then? In any event, Lenin did little to shake suspicions that he was a German agent (a charge levied independently by both Burtsev and Kerensky's government), and the German Foreign Ministry themselves may have come to see Lenin as a sort-of agent of theirs:


https://archive.org/stream/Germany-and-Revolution-in-Russia-1915-1918/GermanyAndRevolutionInRussia1915-1918-DocumentsFromArchivesOfGermanForeignMinistry_djvu.txt
>The Under State Secretary to the Minister in Stockholm and to the Minister in Bern 

>Berlin, 10 May 1917 

>1. TELEGRAM NO. 666 

>Please let loose, through your agent, agitation for publication of military and political agreements made with France and England by old regime in Russia before the war.

>Stumm 

>2. telegram no. 56 i 

>Please draw the attention of the emigres returning to Russia, through suitable agents, to the idea that they should demand from their government the publication of agreements made by the old Russian regime with England and France.

>Stumm 


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/may/14.htm
>V. I.   Lenin
>War and Revolution
>A LECTURE DELIVERED MAY 14 (27), 1917

>...The treaties which the other Allies have are all the same. They wouldn’t have started to subjugate nations if they had not had these treaties. To know their contents you do not have to burrow in special journals. It is sufficient to recollect the basic facts of economic and diplomatic history. For decades Austria has been after the Balkans with an eye to subjugation. And if they have clashed it is because they couldn’t help clashing. That is why, when the masses demand that these treaties should be published, a demand that is growing more insistent every day, ex-Minister Milyukov and the present Minister Tereshchenko (one in a government without socialist ministers, the other in a government with a number of near-socialist ministers) declare that publication of the treaties would mean a break with the Allies.

>Obviously, you can’t publish the treaties because you are all participants in the same gang of robbers.


The truth, however, is almost certainly more complicated: even if Lenin, Helphand, and some of their comrades were willing to act like German agents and take their money, it became clear that the Bolsheviks had little sympathy for the German monarchy once they took power. The German Marxist Rosa Luxemburg, a friend of Helphand, had even begun pro-communist agitation in Germany years before the war's end. And, curiously, the Tsarist secret police didn't seem to be alarmed by the Bolsheviks' German support:


https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=de&u=http://www.spiegel.de/spiegel/spiegelspecialgeschichte/d-54841257.html&prev=search
>...Walter Nicolai, the German intelligence chief, Lenin wrote "to provide my intelligence service with valuable information about the conditions in ... Tsarist Russia."

>Above all, the network that Helphand raised after the conversation with Lenin speaks against the theory of Bolshevik innocence. For at the junctions there are always leading revolutionaries of the Lenin party. Moissej Urizki, later head of the Petrograd secret police (Cheka), worked for Helphand; also Jakob Fürstenberg, one of the closest confidants of Lenin, and after the October Revolution head of the Soviet National Bank, or the discreet attorney Mieczyslaw Koslowski, who co-founded the Cheka. They knew each other and Parvus from the exile, and were often related to each other, which increased the willingness to loyalty and secrecy.

>...The tsarist secret police also showed astonishingly well-informed information as it emerged from documents discovered by the publicist Elisabeth Heresch in Moscow, and published under the title "Secrets of Parvus, The Revolution Purchased."


Lenin's government began fomenting socialist uprisings in Germany almost immediately after the war--an outcome entirely predictable for a movement that preaches global revolution--as well as bringing other sorts of misery to Germany.


https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=de&u=http://www.spiegel.de/spiegel/spiegelspecialgeschichte/d-54841257.html&prev=search
>In the end, Wilhelm's generals did not even dare to relocate soldiers from the Ukraine or the Baltic to the Western Front because the men were meanwhile regarded as unreliable: they sympathized with Lenin's revolution. A request from the Bolsheviks to have 20,000 machine guns, 200,000 rifles, and 500 million cartridges was rejected by the Supreme Command, saying that there was a danger that the weapons "might later be used against us."

>For Lenin calculated as coolly as the Foreign Office, and while he cooperated with the Empire in Moscow during the summer, he spared neither money nor expense to support those comrades in the Reich who were aiming for a German Soviet republic. 


------------


As the war progressed, World War One became disastrously unpopular for the belligerent countries. In Russia, the labor shortage from conscription led to food shortages, and the Russian government, already struggling from a weakened economy, resorted to printing money to fund the war, bringing inflation of nearly 400 percent. Popular discontent with the government grew, and the Bolsheviks and other Russian socialists readily channeled this dissent into support for their cause:


http://alphahistory.com/worldwar1/russian-revolution/
>The effects of World War I gave rise to the Russian Revolution of 1917. By the end of 1916, two years of total war had placed enormous strain on all combatant nations. None felt this more severely than Russia, which had entered the war confident but in a precarious political, economic and social state. The Russian economy made great industrial advances in the two decades prior to 1914, but it was still under-developed and ill-equipped to supply a prolonged war. Russia’s government was still dominated by the tsarist autocracy, which claimed political authority that was divine rather than popular. The Russian people were already fractious, dissatisfied and eager for change. In 1905 their demands had taken the empire to the brink of revolution, before tensions were eased with promises of reform – promises that were never truly fulfilled. The Russian empire rested on what historian Orlando Figes called ‘unstable pillars’, and they were unable to sustain its involvement in one of the most intense wars in history.


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/sep/06.htm
>V. I. Lenin
>Lessons of the Revolution

>...The people want peace. Yet the revolutionary government of free Russia has resumed the war of conquest on the basis of those very same secret treaties which ex-Tsar Nicholas II concluded with the British and French capitalists so that the Russian capitalists might plunder other nations. Those secret treaties remain unpublished. The government of free Russia resorted to subterfuges, and to this day has not proposed a just peace to all nations.

>There is no bread. Famine is again drawing near. Everybody sees that the capitalists and the rich are unscrupulously cheating the treasury on war deliveries (the war is now costing the nation fifty million rubles daily), that they are raking in fabulous profits through high prices, while nothing whatsoever has been done to establish effective control by the workers over the production and distribution of goods. The capitalists are becoming more brazen every day; they are throwing workers out into the street, and this at a time when the people are suffering from shortages.

>...As to land, wait until the Constituent Assembly. As to the Constituent Assembly, wait until the end of the war. As to the end of the war, wait until complete victory. That is what it comes to. The capitalists and landowners, having a majority in the government, are plainly mocking at the peasants.

>...It goes without saying that the Soviets could and should have taken over state power in full. Pending the convocation of the Constituent Assembly there should have been no other power in the state but the Soviets. Only then would our revolution have become a truly popular and truly democratic revolution. Only then could the working people, who are really striving for peace, and who really have no interest in a war of conquest, have begun firmly and resolutely to carry out a policy which would have ended the war of conquest and led to peace.



http://alphahistory.com/worldwar1/russian-revolution/
>...In different times, the departure of tsarism might have paved the way for a brighter future for Russia. The Provisional Government that replaced the tsarist regime did introduce some liberal reforms, like freedoms of assembly and the press, and amnesties for political prisoners. But facing international pressure, it refused to end Russian involvement in the war. The defeats, military follies, casualty lists and food shortages continued, and after six months the Provisional Government’s popularity had slumped. In October 1917 a new political force, the socialist Bolshevik Party, emerged to seize control of the nation. Led by Vladimir Ulyanov, or Lenin, the Bolsheviks promised ‘peace, bread and land’ – promises that resonated with Russian workers, soldiers and sailors. Once in power the Bolsheviks commenced peace negotiations with Germany and, in March 1918, they signed the Treaty of Brest-Litovsk, formally ending Russia’s involvement in the war. It would prove a costly peace: Russia had to surrender large amounts of territory, people and fertile farmland. World War I had killed off one of Europe’s oldest monarchies and gave birth to a new political phenomenon: socialist dictatorship – which later came to deliver its own share of death, deprivation and human suffering.



------------


There's a lot more I wanted write about in detail, but I've been sick and it's been hard for me to focus, so I'm not sure when I'll be able to finish it.

Here's a quick version of the rest:

...


The German revolution, unrest in France, Italy, and the U.S. and around the world. The war was unpopular everywhere, and governments around the world continued the war against the wishes and best interests of workers, soldiers, and other citizens, which galvanized them in opposition to their governments:


https://www.britannica.com/place/Italy/World-War-I-and-fascism
>The war was deeply unpopular both among the troops—mostly conscripted peasants who were undernourished and fighting for a cause few could understand—and among the civilian population back home, which included almost one million workers in arms factories who were also subject to military discipline. Many rebelled within the army. (It has been estimated that some 470,000 conscripts resisted call-up, 310,000 committed acts of indiscipline under arms, and 300,000 deserted.) More than one million soldiers came before military tribunals before a postwar amnesty was granted. Many once again saw the Italian state only as a repressive institution. Antiwar disturbances struck Milan in May 1917, and serious bread riots took place among the industrial workers of Turin in August 1917. Troops occupied Turin and took four days to restore order; some 50 demonstrators and 10 soldiers were killed in the clashes.


http://socialistreview.org.uk/393/revolution-trenches
>Socialist Review
>Revolution in the trenches

>...Given the enormity of the casualties, the war might have been seen by most soldiers as an inescapable juggernaut of death. But as the trenches became almost a fixed feature of the war, soldiers on all sides began to choose to face it with a different attitude — to live and to avoid killing in order not to be killed. They began the practice that became known as “Live and let live”. The best known examples were those at the Christmas truce in 1914, but in-depth studies have shown and many memoirs have recorded that troops on both sides came to more and more frequent “‘live and let live” arrangements. The generals called it fraternisation and forbade it. Russian revolutionary leader Vladimir Lenin wrote that it was the instinctive response of oppressed people, tired, exhausted and losing confidence in capitalist promises. These arrangements were not motivated by clear-cut political ideas. The will to survive and to respect the enemy soldiers’ wish to do the same replaced ruling class exhortations to “Kill the Hun” or “Destroy the English”.

>It was the beginning of a gradual change of attitude among the frontline soldiers, that in the end came to predominate. It finally brought the war to an end in waves of draft dodging, desertions and voluntary surrenders, initially by the Russians, French and Italians in 1917, and from March to October 1918, by the Germans, Bulgarians and Austria-Hungarians. Germany’s defeat was presented by military historians as a hard fought struggle to the bitter end. In reality voluntary surrenders, desertions and mutinies foiled the generals’ plans. The revolutions that followed this mass disobedience brought down three European empires and the Ottoman Empire of the Turks. The “endemic live and let live” truces started the process of troops abandoning the war.

>...Lenin argued that live and let live and draft dodging should not simply continue as the only possible way for individual soldiers to survive through to the peace, but that revolutionaries should set themselves the task of turning fraternisation and the will to survive into politically conscious movements to transfer power into the hands of the revolutionary proletariat.


The Bolsheviks took advantage of this anti-war and anti-government sentiment to channel it into support for their cause around the world. Bienno Rosso ("two red years") in Italy, the 1917 army mutinies in France, the November Revolution in Germany (and the subsequent Spartacist uprising and formation of the short-lived Bavarian Soviet Republic), the Aster Revolution in Hungary (and subsequent formation of the Hungarian Soviet Republic and even shorter lived Slovak Soviet Republic), and the Kiev Bolshevik Uprising in Ukraine were all an immediate result of the war and were all brought about, with varying levels of directness, by Bolsehvik propaganda and agitation:


https://books.google.com/books?id=jYdgAwAAQBAJ&pg=PT264
>...The example of the soviets encouraged radical industrial militants everywhere to see their local power as a means of pressing for peace. The most serious popular upheaval of the war in Italy, the insurrection in Turin in August 1917, was partly triggered by a visiting delegation from the Petrograd Soviet, greeted by 40,000 Turinese socialists and metalworkers crying, 'Long live the Russian Revolution, long live Lenin!' Although caused by bread shortages and bitter hostility over industrial discipline, the Turin rising rapidly adopted the demand for peace. In France, where the political culture of labour drew on a broad revolutionary tradition, the Russian Revolution strengthened the tendency for economic and political protest, including the demand for peace, to be expressed in revolutionary language and imagery. 'The Russian Revolution has occurred just when the peoples [of Europe] are weary of spilling their blood to satisfy the appetites of the Tsar, the Kaiser, and Poincare' declared the French socialist deputy and Kienthal signatory Pierre Brizon in March 1917. 'The revolutionaries will impose peace, which will bring the regeneration of humankind and abolish all frontiers.' Even in Britain, where the political culture of labour was generally anything but revolutionary, the prestige of the March (or February) Revolution gave a fillip to the yearning for peace. An extraordinary meeting of socialist opposition groups, held in Leeds in June 1917, called for the establishment of 'Councils of Workers and Soldiers' throughout the country.


&nbsp;


https://books.google.co.uk/books?id=CInVseCvW-wC&pg=PA9
>The Hungarian Revolutions of 1918 and 1919

>In the fall of 1918, as it became clear that the war had been lost, revolutionary forces began gathering in Budapest. Tensions among the population had been rising, with food riots, strikes, and increasing desertions from the army--a result of the terrible losses during the war, rising prices and growing shortages. The revolutionary spirit of the October Revolution of 1917 was spreading, fueled by the returning Hungarian prisoners of war from Russia with demonstrations expressing sympathy with the Bolsheviks and demanding peace.


https://books.google.com/books?id=yBMWAwAAQBAJ&pg=PT238&lpg=PT238
>The novelty effect soon turned to disillusionment among those who had hoped for better days, and the conflict between the regime and its increasingly numerous enemies rapidly turned into terror. Indeed, there was no attempt to disguise its nature: the government set up a parallel police force, a special terror unity, colloquially known as 'Lenin's boys', referring to the great leader who encouraged his Hungarian comrades in ruthlessly haranguing the enemies and traitors of the revolution, including Social Democrats. 'Shoot them'--was Lenin's telegraphed message to Kun. Carrying out this order would have caused embarrassment since Social Democrats were in government. The 'Lenin's boys' did not find themselves out of work, however. The exact number of victims is unknown; estimates vary enormously from a few hundred to a few thousand.

>The dictatorship was run by the government and its five-member Directorate. At close quarters, Bela Kun behaved like a less ambitious Lenin. A provincial journalist with some oratory and organising skills, Kun had returned from Moscow with an informal mandate from Lenin.


https://books.google.com/books?id=sPbqDSWXK7QC&pg=PA145&lpg=PA145
>In late March 191, the Bolshevik journalist Bela Kun gained power as the leader of a radical Hungarian Soviet Republic, which attempted to regain Slovakia through a military incursion by the Hungarian Red Army at the beginning of May. The Hungarians occupied two-thirds of Slovakia and instituted local soviets in some areas of Slovakia and Ruthenia. A Slovak Soviet Republic appeared in Presov on June 16 with its leaders declaring their support for the Soviet Republics in Hungary and Russia.


https://books.google.com/books?id=QtwzDwAAQBAJ&pg=PT86
>The only Communist government installed in any European state for more than a brief period was the Bela Kun Government of Hungary, which held power from March 21, 1919, to August 1, 1919. Lenin did his utmost to help this government to survive, sending funds and jewels by secret couriers, and giving constant advice and directions to Kun by radio.


https://books.google.com/books?id=yBMWAwAAQBAJ&pg=PT238&lpg=PT238
>...After the collapse of the Hungarian Soviets, when [Kun] was once more in exile in Moscow, he carried the accolade of having sustained a Soviet Republic in the heart of Europe for 133 days. This unique experience subsequently placed him at the top of the Communist International, until 1937, the year of his downfall followed by his execution.


&nbsp;


http://www.jstor.org/stable/24436670
>The French Army Mutinies of 1917

>...Although it may have been superficial, the influence of the Russian revolution on the mutineers was unmistakable. Notable in this connection, and perhaps the best known incident of the mutinies, is the revolt of the Russian brigades. Three Russian brigades had arrived in France early in 1916 for service on the French front. They were already infected by the revolutionary propaganda that was rife in the Czar's army. After the March revolution they had formed soviets and demanded to vote on their participation in the April 16 offensive. They had voted overwhelmingly to fight, and according to Painlevé, who was in a position to know, they conducted themselves gallantly before Brimont. Painlevé suggests it was the First Russian Brigade that sowed the seeds of the mutinies. The date of their first act of insubordination is not clear, although it would appear to have been around the middle of May. By June they had been transferred to an isolation camp at Courtine near Limoges. Here on June 9 the soldiers' council of the First Regiment published a manifesto that ranks as the most revealing document of the period of the mutinies:

>>Since our arrival in France a year and a half ago, the rumor has been current that we had been sold for munitions. These rumors have multiplied more and more; in short they consider the Russian soldier not as a man but as a thing.

>Terrail reports that during the next three days a loyal Russian brigade fired 500 rounds of artillery into the camp. After eight men were killed and twenty-eight wounded, the rest submitted to discipline. Churchill repeats this statement, which would appear to be the origin of the many stories of the bombardment of mutineers that were circulated after the event. On the other hand, Major General Sir Edward Spears has informed the writers that there was no shelling of mutinous troops, although he agrees that the Russians bear much responsibility for inciting the revolts.

>...the first Russian revolution, was clearly in the minds of many French soldiers during the uprisings. The socialist slogans that were shouted, the demands that the government issue passports to the Stockholm peace convention, and the general agreement on the pernicious example of the Russian brigades make clear the importance of foreign socialist influence.


http://journals.sagepub.com/doi/abs/10.1177/096834459500200203?journalCode=wiha
>War and 'Politics': The French Army Mutinies of 1917

>...they involved a collective and categorical refusal of orders to take up positions in the front lines. Second, for the most part, the demonstrations concluded with soldiers leaving for other units to encourage further resistance. Third, soldier's stated demands--sometimes including peace though revolution if necessary--went well beyond boundaries of expression normally conceded even to citizen-soldiers.


&nbsp;


http://socialistreview.org.uk/393/revolution-trenches
>Socialist Review
>Revolution in the trenches

>...In April 1917 when the Americans joined the war almost half the French army overstayed home leave, deserted or mutinied, often singing the Internationale in protest at the war’s continuation. Subsequently general Petain kept the mutineers out of any major battles for almost a year and regained their loyalty by meeting many of their demands for longer leave and better food. With the help of the French Social Democrats he was able to deflect the drive to revolution.

>The same was not the case when the German soldiers and sailors decided to desert en masse and to surrender without a fight. No German general succeeded in driving them back into the trenches.


https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=de&u=http://www.spiegel.de/spiegel/spiegelspecialgeschichte/d-54841257.html&prev=search
>...slowly it dawned on the German strategists that in the end they would be the losers of the purposive alliance between Lenin and the Hohenzollern empire.

>In the end, Wilhelm's generals did not even dare to relocate soldiers from the Ukraine or the Baltic to the Western Front because the men were meanwhile regarded as unreliable: they sympathized with Lenin's revolution. A request from the Bolsheviks to have 20,000 machine guns, 200,000 rifles, and 500 million cartridges was rejected by the Supreme Command, saying that there was a danger that the weapons "might later be used against us."

>For Lenin calculated as coolly as the Foreign Office, and while he cooperated with the Empire in Moscow during the summer, he spared neither money nor expense to support those comrades in the Reich who were aiming for a German Soviet republic.

>The Germans should have been warned - it was the same policy of revolution that they had supported in the years before when it was against the Czar. 


http://socialistreview.org.uk/393/revolution-trenches
>...Subsequent attacks by the Germans failed due to the drastically depleted ranks of their divisions. Draft dodging in Germany had become so common in 1917 that enrolment fell from 1.4 million to 0.6 million, a figure that reduced reserves for all the German armies and the size of its divisions at the front to the point where offensive battles were no longer possible. This marked the end of Ludendorff’s war plans. Many of the German relief divisions, having served in Russia in the run up to the Brest-Litovsk peace treaty, when fraternisation with the Russians had become common, sounded like Bolsheviks according to one top commander.


https://wwi.lib.byu.edu/index.php/IX_SOLDIERS_SHOOTING_THEIR_OWN_OFFICERS
>A German Deserter's War Experience
>1917
>
>...However, not all the soldiers approved of that senseless, that criminal murdering. Some of the "gentlemen" who had ordered us to massacre our French comrades were killed "by mistake" in the darkness of the night, by their own people, of course. Such "mistakes" repeat themselves almost daily, and if I keep silence with regard to many such mistakes which I could relate, giving the exact name and place, the reader will know why.


http://socialistreview.org.uk/393/revolution-trenches
>...Ten percent of the replacements jumped off the trains as they were transferred to the Western Front. Others had been sent to the front as punishment for going on strike in the munition factories. “Stay at home,” they shouted to the men they were replacing. The “hidden army strike” removed over a million troops from Germany’s field armies sent to defend its borders after the failure of the spring offensive.

>...In the final months of the war one in every two in the reserves failed to report for duty. Ludendorff himself became a deserter in late October and fled to Sweden. Some army generals and those commanding the navy and the air force called for national unity in one last ditch battle. They even considered bombing the trains that the deserters-turned-mutineers had commandeered to take them home. The Kaiser, Emperor Wilhelm II, supported the generals’ call for a desperate last stand. He and those preparing to attack their own workers and soldiers were over-ruled by the lower ranks of generals for fear of provoking a civil war in Germany. Without the support of his generals, the Kaiser abandoned his post.

>In November 1918 sailors at Kiel naval port joined the mutiny and took over the town and the German Revolution had begun.


http://richthofen.com/scheer/scheer18c.htm
>...we suffered the bitterest disappointment at the hands of the crews of the Fleet. Thanks to an unscrupulous agitation which had been fermenting for a long time, the idea had taken root in their minds that they were to be uselessly sacrificed. They were encouraged in this mistaken belief, because they could see no indication of a will to decisive action in the bearing of the Government. Insubordination broke out when, on October 29, the Commander-in-Chief of the Fleet was making preparations to weigh anchor for the planned attack. As always, the intentions and aim of the expedition had been kept secret from the crews, until they were at sea. The mutiny was at first confined to a few battleships and first class cruisers, but it assumed such dimensions on these ships that the Commander-in-Chief of the Fleet thought it incumbent upon him to desist from his project. By seizing the agitators and imprisoning them in the meantime in Wilhelmshaven, he hoped that the ships could be calmed down. The crews of the torpedo-boats and the U-boats had remained thoroughly loyal.

>The Commander-in-Chief of the Fleet reported these events to the Navy Command on November 2, saying that they were due to a Bolshevist movement, directed by members of the Independent Social Democratic Party, on board the ships. As a means of agitation, they had made use of the statement that the Government wanted peace and the officers did not.


https://books.google.com/books?id=ZInPBAAAQBAJ&printsec=frontcover&dq=Kiel+%22shop+stewards%22+%22revolutionary+stewards%22&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwj5mvHZ8eDXAhURMd8KHeRNARsQ6AEIMzAC#v=onepage&q=Kiel%20stewards&f=false
>The German Revolution in Berlin: 1918

>During the war the Shop Stewards had organised an escalating series of political mass strikes and one may be tempted to take the revolutionary events of November 1918 in Berlin as the fourth and final mass strike. The three previous strikes had radicalised the Stewards, workers of Berlin and other industrial centres and they now believed that only a revolution would end war and hunger.

>...the Shop Stewards did not want to initiate action until the mood was right--and then they wanted to spring into action on a massive scale throughout Germany. The element of surprise was meant to give the Empire and additional, final blow and overthrow it. This time, the Shop Stewards were not preparing for just another mass strike, however big and impressive; they were preparing for Revolution.

>Arming the Revolution

>For weeks, Emil Barth had organised the purchase and collection of weapons. ...Barth apparently acquired money for weapons from the Soviet embassy. Muller would later deny that the Shop Stewards received money from abroad without, however, revealing where the money came from instead. Historian Ottokar Luban, who reconstructed the reapons procurement process in considerable detail from available archival sources, found that the Shop Stewards had been in contact with the Bolsheviks starting in September 1918. A representative of the Russian revolutionaries actually participated in a Shop Stewards' meeting in mid-September. To ensure secrecy, they had no further direct contact with the Shop Stewards and the money was not transferred until October.

>...The Shop Stewards continually postponed the uprising at the secret meetings despite the impatience of the Spartacists in general and Karl Liebknecth in particular, principally because the arms they sought came late and, in their view, were insufficient. Under no circumstances did they want to engage in a struggle for Berlin, the capital, without being prepared for the possibility of armed counter-attack by loyal soldiers.

>...Detailed deployment plans were prepared and a choreography of revolution emerged at last on the morning of 2 November, when the REvolutionary Shop Stewards and the Spartacists met in a pub in Berlin-Neukolln. Several armed marches would proceed from the large factories on the city's periphery to the barracks and then, along with deserting soldiers and the additional weapons they brought, they would occupy the key positions in the city. It was quite clear to the revolutionaries that they could not win an armed battle with a loyal army. The troops would therefor have to either be intimidated or surprised into remaining neutral or, better yet, persuaded to desert.

>...Even as the finishing touches were being applied to these plans for the uprising in Berlin, however, the German November Revolution was breaking out elsewhere. The first mutinies in the High Seas Fleet had erupted on 27 October. Sailors, many of them former workers who had been drafted into the imperial navy's 'floating factories', as German battleships were known because of their heavy machinery, refused to leave the harbour for a final assault on the British navy. They saw it as a suicide mission and refused the orders of their superiors. A few days later, rebel sailors hoisted the red flag over the battleships and elected sailors' councils. There was no denying it any more: the Revolution was under way.

&nbsp;

https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1918/aug/28.htm
>Vladimir Lenin

>...The Russian revolution has shown that the war is inevitably leading to the disintegration of capitalist society in general, that it is being converted into a war of the working people against the exploiters. Therein lies the significance of the Russian revolution.


The Bolsheviks were well-prepared to, as Lenin put it, "convert" the war between imperialist powers into a war between the proletariat and the bourgeois. Bolsheviks and their sympathizers inserted themselves into the forefront of the anti-war movement from an early stage--the German communist Rosa Luxemburg began anti-war agitation as early as the July crisis--and so, when public frustration with the war came to a boil, were ready to organize socialist revolutions against their governments, often with Soviet support.

The war was a calamity: mines and shelling left swathes of land uninhabitable, just about every belligerent was economically ruined, and soldiers were conscripted to die from combat, disease, and famine by the millions--in France nearly every family had lost at least one member. The question of "what can be done to end the war?" thus occupied the minds of citizens and soldiers alike, along with the natural follow-up, "who can we look to to lead such an effort?" The Bolsheviks sought to answer both:


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/apr/04.htm
>Vladimir Ilyich Lenin
>The Tasks of the Proletariat in the Present Revolution

>...In view of the undoubted honesty of those broad sections of the mass believers in revolutionary defencism who accept the war only as a necessity, and not as a means of conquest, in view of the fact that they are being deceived by the bourgeoisie, it is necessary with particular thoroughness, persistence and patience to explain their error to them, to explain the inseparable connection existing between capital and the imperialist war, and to prove that without overthrowing capital *it is impossible* to end the war by a truly democratic peace, a peace not imposed by violence. 


https://www.marxists.org/archive/luxemburg/1915/xx/theses.htm
>Rosa Luxemburg

>Theses on the Tasks of International Social-Democracy

>...World peace cannot be assured by projects utopian or, at bottom, reactionary, such as tribunals of arbitration by capitalist diplomatists, diplomatic “disarmament” conventions, “the freedom of the seas,” abolition of the right of maritime arrest, “the United States of Europe,” a “customs union for central Europe,” buffer states, and other illusions. Imperialism, militarism and war can never be abolished nor attenuated so long as the capitalist class exercises, uncontested, its class hegemony. The sole means of successful resistance, and the only guarantee of the peace of the world, is the capacity for action and the revolutionary will of the international proletariat to hurl its full weight into the balance.


https://www.marxists.org/archive/kun-bela/1918/05/24.htm
>Bela Kun
>The Model Product of Imperialism
>
>...The state of mind of the troops shows that that struggle has already begun. If there are still “Social Democrats” who, fearing an Austrian defeat, deliberately stand in the way of the revolution, they will be swept away by the masses of true proletarians.

>After this treaty, the Austro-Hungarian proletariat is even more definitely than before at the cross roads of the dilemma: endless war or the revolution? 


A repeated theme in Bolshevik propaganda was that only a revolution of the proletariat could truly end the war. The war, in their parlance, was an "imperialist war" deliberately caused by capitalists in order to turn a profit. Bolshevik propaganda stated that war is an inevitable result of capitalism, and so the only way to achieve to lasting peace is to replace "world capitalism" with a new form of economics and government, typically some form of socialism or communism. Naturally, the propagandists would be the "experts" in these new forms of government and so would be found in positions of power after the revolutions they called for had succeeded. 

The importance of the Bolshevik's propaganda cannot be overstated. A testament to its efficacy can be seen in the frustration of many of the belligerents' military commanders, such as Commander Nivelle in France, General Ludendorff in Germany, and particularly General Denikin of Russia, who wrote extensively of Bolshevik propaganda and its deleterious effects on the Russian army in his memoirs:


https://archive.org/stream/russianturmoilme00deniuoft/russianturmoilme00deniuoft_djvu.txt
>The Russian turmoil; memoirs: military, social, and political
>by Denikin, Anton Ivanovich

>...I have more grounds and more right to speak of the Army and in the name of the Army than all those strangers of the Socialist Camp, who, in their haughty self-conceit, as soon as they touched the Army, began breaking down its foundations, judging its leaders and fighters and diagnosing its serious disease, who even now, after grievous experiments and experiences, have not given up the hope of transforming this mighty and terrible weapon of national self-preservation into a means for satisfying party and social appetites. For me, the Army is not only an historical, social, national phenomenon, but nearly the whole of my life, in which lie many memories, precious and not to be forgotten, in which all is bound up and interlaced into one general mass of swiftly passing days of sadness and of joy, in which there are hundreds of cherished graves, of buried dreams and unextinguishable faith.

>...Then came a torrent of newspapers, appeals, resolutions, orders, from some unknown authority, and with them a whole series of new ideas, which the soldier masses were unable to digest and assimilate. New people appeared, with a new speech, so fascinating and promising, liberating the soldiers from obedience and inspiring hope that they would be saved from deadly danger immediately. When one Regimental Commander naively inquired whether these people might not be tried by Field Court-Martial and shot, his telegram, after passing through all official stages, called forth the reply from Petrograd that these people were inviolable, and had been sent by the Soviet to the troops for the very purpose of explaining to them the true meaning of current events. 

>When such leaders of the Revolutionary Democracy, as have not yet lost their feeling of responsibility for crucified Russia, now say that the movement, caused by the deep class differences between the officers and the soldiers and by " the enslavement " of the latter, was of an elemental nature, which they could not resist, this is deeply untrue. 

>All the fundamental slogans, all the programmes, tactics, instructions and text-books, forming the foundation of the "democratisation" of the Army, had been drawn up by the military sections of the secret Socialist parties long before the War, outside of "elemental" pressure, on the grounds of clear, cold calculation, as a product of "Socialist reasoning and conscience." 

>True, the officers strove to persuade the men not to believe the "new words" and to do their duty. But from the very beginning the Soviets had declared the officers to be foes of the Revolution; in many towns they had been subjected to cruel torture and death, and this with impunity. Evidently not without some reason, when even the "Bourgeois" Duma issued such a strange and unexpected "announcement" as the following: "This first day of March, rumours were spread among the soldiers of the garrison of Petrograd to the effect that the officers in the regiments were disarming the soldiers. These rumours were investigated and found to be false. As President of the Military Commission of the Provisional Committee of the State Duma, I declare that the most decided measures will be taken to prevent such action on the part of the officers, up to the shooting of those guilty of it. Signed, Colonel Engelhardt." 

>Next came Order No. I., the Declaration and so forth.

>...Perhaps, however, it might have been possible to combat all this verbal ocean of lies and hypocrisy which flowed from Petrograd and from the local Soviets and was echoed by the local demagogues had it not been for a circumstance which paralysed all the efforts of the Commanders, viz., the animal feeling of self-preservation which had flooded the whole mass of the soldiers. This feeling had always existed. But it had been kept under and restrained by examples of duty fulfilled, by flashes of national self-consciousness, by shame, fear and pressure. When all these elements had disappeared, when for the soothing of a drowsy conscience there was a whole arsenal of new conceptions, which justified the care for one's own hide and furnished it with an ideal basis, then the Army could exist no longer. This feeling upset all the efforts of the Commanders, all moral principles and the whole regiment of the Army.

>...Nine a.m. The first Company gradually begins to awaken. The trenches are incredibly defiled; in the narrow communication trenches and those of the second line the air is thick and close. The parapet is crumbling away. No one troubles to repair it; no one feels inclined to do so, and there are not enough men in the Company. There is a large number of deserters; more than fifty have been allowed to go. Old soldiers have been demobilised, others have gone on leave with the arbitrary permission of the Committee. Others, again, have been elected members of numerous Committees, or gone away as delegates; a while ago, for instance, the Division sent a numerous delegation to " Comrade " Kerensky to verify whether he had really given orders for an advance. Finally, by threats and violence, the soldiers have so terrorised the regimental surgeons that the latter have been issuing medical certicates even to the "thoroughly fit." 

>In the trenches the hours pass slowly and wearily, in dullness and idleness. In one corner men are playing cards, in another a soldier returned from leave is lazily and listlessly telling a story; the air is full of obscene swearing. Someone reads aloud from the Russian Messenger the following: 

>"The English want the Russians to shed the last drop of their blood for the greater glory of England, who seeks her profit in everything. . . . Dear soldiers, you must know that Russia would have concluded peace long ago had not England prevented her. . . . We must turn away from her — the Russian people demand it; such is their sacred will." 

>...Along the trenches came Lieutenant Albov, the Company Commander. He said to the groups of soldiers, somewhat irresolutely and entreatingly: 

>"Comrades, get to work quickly. In three days we have not made a single communication trench to the firing line." 

>The card players did not even look round; someone said in a low voice, "All right." The man reading the newspaper rose and reported, in a free and easy manner: 

>"The Company does not want to dig, because that would be preparation for an advance, and the Committee has resolved. . ."

>"Look here, you understand nothing at all about it, and, moreover, why do you speak for the whole Company? Even if we remain on the defensive we are lost in case of an alarm; the whole Company cannot get out to the firing line along a single trench." 

>He said this, and with a gesture of despair went on his way. Matters were hopeless. Every time he tried to speak with them for a time, and in a friendly way, they would listen to him attentively; they liked to talk to him, and, on the whole, his Company looked on him favourably in their own way. But he felt that between him and them a wall had sprung up, against which all his good impulses were shattered. He had lost the path to their soul — lost it in the impassable jungle of darkness, roughness, and that wave of distrust and suspicion which had overwhelmed the soldiers. Was it, perhaps, that he used the wrong words, or was not able to say what he meant? Scarcely that. But a little while before the War, when he was a student and was carried away by the popular movement, he had visited villages and factories and had found "real words " which were clear and comprehensible to all. But, most of all, with what words can one move men to face death when all their feelings are veiled by one feeling — that of self-preservation?


By most accounts, the propaganda was particularly effective among soldiers, many who had been forced to fight in a war they did not want nor understand. For a soldier bearing brunt of the horrors of World War I in the trenches (to give an example: 1.2 million men were lost in the Battle of the Somme for a mere 7.8 miles of territory), the Bolsheviks' propaganda which, as Denikin put it bluntly, "justified the care for one's own hide and furnished it with an ideal basis," might have been especially appealing. The Bolsheviks provided noble-sounding reasons for soldiers to rebel and desert:


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/apr/20e.htm
>V. I.   Lenin
>Appeal to the Soldiers of All the Belligerent Countries

>...Are we going to continue submissively to bear our yoke, to put up with the war between the capitalist classes?Are we going to let this war drag on by taking the side of our own national governments, our own national bourgeoisies, our own national capitalists, and thereby destroying the international unity of the workers of all countries, of the whole world?

>No, brother soldiers, it is time we opened our eyes, it is time we took our fate into our own hands. In all countries popular wrath against the capitalist class, which has drawn the people into the war, is growing, spreading, and gaining strength. Not only in Germany, but even in Britain, which before the war had the reputation of being one of the freest countries, hundreds and hundreds of true friends and representatives of the working class are languishing in prison for having spoken the honest truth against the war and against the capitalists. The [February] revolution in Russia is only the first step of the first revolution; it should be followed and will be followed by others. 


https://www.bl.uk/russian-revolution/articles/propaganda-in-the-russian-revolution
>Bolshevik anti-war propaganda during the First World War was based on Lenin’s idea formulated in his work The War and Russian Social-Democracy (October, 1914):  ‘The conversion of the present imperialist war into a civil war is the only correct proletarian slogan’.

>As the War progressed, the slogan became increasingly popular, as it seemed to overcome moral contradictions for soldiers and sailors from poor backgrounds. According to the logic of this slogan, unwillingness to kill or be killed does not make a person a traitor, because class loyalty can outweigh allegiance to the state.

>This idea addressed to the masses implied that a sacrifice for the Homeland was not necessary, as the country was represented by the state that had betrayed its citizens by oppressing them.


The Italian army saw nearly a million desertions, and the German offensives of 1918 were stopped in part by desertions and failure to enroll. Nearly half of the front armies of the French took part in the mutinies of 1917, which were linked to "defeatist" propaganda. The issue of "enemy" propaganda in the French army and press rose to such prominence in France that it led to a treason trial of the Minister of the Interior: 


http://www.jstor.org/stable/24436670
>The French Army Mutinies of 1917

>...The most damming evidence against the Minister of the Interior, viewed in historical perspective, is Nivelle's letter of February 28, already cited, in which the general asked Minister of War Lyautey to intervene with Malvy to take action against the disseminators of pacifist and defeatist propaganda, who were undermining the morale of the army. He did not say, as Mangin tried to imply before the letter became public, that the police under Malvy were actually protecting the propagandists, but the general did make it clear that he had received no co-operation from the Ministry of the Interior on what he regarded as a critical matter.


https://wwi.lib.byu.edu/index.php/Malvy
>At the outbreak of war Malvy resisted calls for the round-up of so-called subversives unionists, pacifists and other 'undesirables' whose names were listed in the Carnet B. He became involved in subsidising newspapers and came under intense criticism when it was learned that the Bonnet Rouge (one of the papers supported by Malvy) had been receiving German money to spread pacifist propaganda.

>When the paper's administrator, Duval, was arrested with a cheque on his person from a German banker, Clemenceau accused Malvy during a secret session of the Senate in July 1917 of 'betraying the interests of France'. When the paper's director was also arrested as a result of the subsequent investigation (which revealed the sale of the paper to a shadowy intermediary, Bolo Pacha), the paper was closed and its director died in prison.

>Added to the civilian unrest of 1917 and the French Army mutinies, the discovery of French military documents in the Bonnet Rouge's offices meant the end for Malvy. 

>As Minister of the Interior, he was blamed for not suppressing defeatist and pacifist agitators and publications with sufficient energy and he was forced to resign on 31 August 1917. In October he was charged with treason and tried by a special commission of the Senate the following year. Although acquitted of treason, he was found guilty of culpable negligence in the performance of his duties and banished for five years. His former directeur du cabinet was imprisoned, however, and Bolo and Duval received death sentences.


(see also: https://books.google.com/books?id=tnsxAQAAMAAJ&pg=PA267&lpg=PA267)


And, of course, the formation of paramilitary Red Guards and the October revolution would not have been possible without Bolshevik propaganda.

With the help of Bolshevik propaganda, the war took in conscripts and produced soldiers angry and disillusioned with their governments, sympathetic to Bolshevist ideas, emboldened in mutinous attitudes, and highly experienced in combat--an ideal setup for socialist revolutions. The fruits of this labor can be seen in the Red Guards' seizing of the Winter Palace, the Hungarian Army's support for the Aster revolution, the the Kiel mutiny, the French army mutinies, and so on. Behind the lines, propaganda and agitation played an equally important role: many of the Red Guards were armed workers, and socialist-organized strikes built support for the revolution in Germany and almost did so in Italy (for a thorough, if biased, overview of socialist strikes, see http://isj.org.uk/the-mass-strike-in-the-first-world-war/ . See also https://books.google.com/books?id=v0A7AAAAYAAJ for some insight into Russian socialist activities in the U.S. during and after the war.)

For all the gains to be had by their propaganda, the Bolsheviks were remarkably good at not paying for it:


https://archive.org/stream/Germany-and-Revolution-in-Russia-1915-1918/GermanyAndRevolutionInRussia1915-1918-DocumentsFromArchivesOfGermanForeignMinistry_djvu.txt
>The Chancellor to the Foreign Ministry Liaison Officer  at General Headquarters

>Berlin, 26 July 1917

>...I should therefore be very grateful if the intended statement could be temporarily shelved, and if General Ludendorff could give me an opportunity to express an opinion before he formulates new principles for propaganda at the front. We must be very careful that the literature with which we are aiming to further the process of disintegration inside Russia does not achieve the directly opposite result. 1

>...1. E. Vandervelde, who spent two weeks touring the Eastern front in June 1917, wrote in his Three Aspects of Russian Revolution (London, 1918, p. 134) : 'It seems that this propaganda, while admirably organized and splendidly carried on has the same fault that we find in all German enterprises of this sort; it over-reaches its mark, and provokes finally, by its ponderous insistence, a psychological reaction which is the one result that its organizers failed to foresee.' Vandervelde also noticed the similarity between German propaganda and the views of the Bolsheviks, the Mensheviks, and the Internationalists (p. 133). Bruce Lockhart wrote in The Two Revolutions (London, 1957, p. 93) : '. . . most of the Bolshevik propaganda, including Lenin's articles, which reached the Russian front was disseminated by the Germans, who, either with or without the connivance of Lenin, were able to buy the Bolshevik newspapers in Stockholm and reproduce them.' 


https://books.google.com/books?id=_Z46AQAAMAAJ&pg=PA138&lpg=PA138
>...By Vladimir Bourtzev

>...During the war Malinovsky was in Germany, and the Germans, who knew him as a friend and co-worker of Lenine, entrusted to him the propaganda of Bolshevist ideas among the Russian prisoners, which he conducted on an extensive scale.



https://books.google.com/books?id=V3IeAQAAMAAJ&pg=PA418&lpg=PA418
>New Lights on the Russian Revolution

>June 14, 1919

>...Mr. Spargo traces the intricate history of the Russian revolutionary parties and shows how the Socialists in 1902 slit in two, the majority (Bolsheveki) following Lenin, and the minority (Mensheviki) following Plechanov. At first the Bolsheviki were nurst by the Czar, later by the Kaiser. The most violent of the Bolshevik leaders in the Duma, Malinovsky, a close friend of Lenin, turned out to be a police spy and *provocateur*, and his fiery speeches attacking the Government and the bourgeoisie were written for him by Beletzky of the Police Department.

>...The charge that the Bolshevik movement was secretly encouraged by the Russian Government before the war is confirmed by Serge Persky in the latest volume of his journalistic articles, From Nicholas II to Lenin. He has a photograph of notes of a speech delivered by Malinovsky in the Duma which had been OK'd and annotated by the Minister Maarof. Pravda ("Truth"), the official organ of the Bolshevists, was subsidized by the Okhrana (secret police), and Lenin himself in 1910 or 1911 had relations with them. When this was exposed Lenin defended himself in the same fashion as when charged with receiving German aid:

>>It was not the Okhrana that made use of us but on the contrary we that made use of the Okhrana. Without doubt the Okhrana has rendered great services to our party without ever obtaining anything from us.


https://archive.org/stream/russianturmoilme00deniuoft/russianturmoilme00deniuoft_djvu.txt
>...the Army was flooded with criminal Bolshevik and Defeatist literature. The stuff upon which our Army was fed — and apparently at the expense of Government funds and of the people's treasure — can be gauged from the report of the Moscow Military Bureau, which alone supplied to the Front the following publications: 

>>From March 24th to May 1st —
>>>7,972 copies of the Pravda
>>>2,000  "    "   Soldiers' Pravda
>>>30,375 "    "   Social Democrat

>>From May 1st to June 11th —
>>>61,522 copies of the Soldiers' Pravda
>>>32,711   "    "  Social Democrat
>>>6,999 11 "    "  Pravda

>and so on. The same kind of literature was sent to the villages by the soldiers.


The Tsarist government, the German government, and the Russian provisional government all at various points funded and distributed Bolshevik propaganda to their own detriment.

If such activities were a detriment to these governments, however, it wasn't always so for their members: some later became high-ranking officials in the Soviet Union or the Weimer Republic, such as the Russian Captain Verchovsky or German State Secretary von Jagow:


https://archive.org/details/fallofthedynasti012755mbp
>There may be one man still alive who knows the whole story; the Russian assistant military attaché, Captain Alexander Werchovski, who replaced Artamanov during his absence. A friend of Werchovski, a Polish nobleman named Louis de Trydar-Burzynski, stated in his memoirs, published in Italy in 1926, that “the assassination [at Sarajevo] was perpetrated with the support of the Russian military attaché at Belgrade, Captain Werchovski...” Werchovski, he continued, “was later War Minister in the Kerensky government; he was a young man whom I had known very well for years, and he told me quite frankly the truth about the origins, preparations and execution of the plot.” Unfortunately, Werchovski, if he is living today, is not likely to tell any more about the case; when last heard of, he held a high command in the Red Army—a curious detail in itself.


https://archive.org/details/fallofthedynasti012755mbp
>Localized war was, in fact, the official catchword in Berlin and Vienna. The sooner it came, the better, according to the experts. 

>The bolder Austria became, and the more strongly she was supported, “the more likely Russia is to keep quiet,” said Herr Gottlieb von Jagow, the German Secretary of State (Foreign Minister).


https://books.google.com/books?id=DBwTBQAAQBAJ&pg=PA957&lpg=PA957
>In Lichnowsky's view, Britain would definitely support Russia and France in any war defending Serbia against Austrian aggression. Jagow in particular, however, believed that Lichnowsky had been duped by the British. In August 1914 on the British declaration of war against Germany, Lichnowsky left his post, returned to Germany, and retired from the diplomatic service.

>In a privately circulated pamphlet in 1916, Lichnowsky asserted that his efforts to prevent the outbreak of World War I had not been supported by the German government. This pamphlet, published in January 1918 without his permission and widely distributed by the Allies, caused his expulsion from the Prussian upper house of parliament in April 1918.


https://archive.org/details/fallofthedynasti012755mbp
>...Lichnowsky’s dispatch reached the Wilhelmstrasse at about the same moment as a message from Vienna informing the German government that Austria would declare war on Serbia the next day, or at the latest on July 29. Thereupon Bethmann-Hollweg committed either an incredible blunder, or—as Albertini and some other historians believe—an act of almost equally incredible duplicity. Acting upon instructions from the Kaiser, he forwarded to Vienna Sir Edward Grey’s suggestion about German good offices, but on his own initiative he omitted a key passage in the message he had received from the German Embassy in London which stressed the seriousness of the British warning, and he failed to indicate any official German endorsement of the suggestion; he merely asked for the Austrian views about it. He even allowed his colleague, Jagow, to call in the Austrian Ambassador, and in effect to advise him that the Austrians should pay no attention to any British suggestions that Berlin might feel obliged, for the sake of the record, to forward.


https://archive.org/stream/Germany-and-Revolution-in-Russia-1915-1918/GermanyAndRevolutionInRussia1915-1918-DocumentsFromArchivesOfGermanForeignMinistry_djvu.txt
>The State Secretary of the Foreign Ministry to the State  Secretary of the Treasury 

>Berlin, 6 July, 1915 

>Five million marks are required here for the promotion of Revlulionary propaganda in Russia. As this sum cannot be covered out of the funds at our disposal, I would like to request Your Excellency to put it at my disposal by charging it to Article VI, Section II of the extraordinary budget. I should be extremely grateful to Your Excellency if you would inform me  what action is taken. 1

>JAGOW 

>1 The request was granted on 9 July.


https://www.jstor.org/stable/2538811
>...In short, the high bureaucracy was not interested in personnel purges in 1919. Nor were the dominant Social Democrats. In fact, the SPD never demanded that the senior statesmen and diplomats of the empire be held accountable. The resulting irony was that the Republic's Committee of Enquiry, for example, relied for many of its "expert" affidavits upon the very men who had been in positions of power and responsibility in July 1914, men such as Gottleib von Jagow and Johanes Kreig. By failing to clean house in 1919, by failing to confront the matter of Germany's role in the origins of the First World War brutally and honestly, and, above all, by failing to chase the patriotic censors from their temples of influence, the first leaders of the Weimar Republic did their country a great disservice.


The case of von Jagow and his accomplices at the German Foreign Ministry is particularly awkward: Jagow acted suspiciously to start the war, then acted carelessly to fund the Bolsheviks, only for the Bolsheviks to turn around and arm and support the anti-war German Revolutionaries, who proceeded to act suspiciously to keep Jagow in office!

More than a few of the key players in World War One made decisions which, when viewed in aggregate, are awkward or hard to explain. The Tsarist Foreign Minister Sazonov, for example, had worked closely with the Okhrana in a plot to dissolve the Duma in June 1907; the same Sazonov convinced the Tsar to mobilize his forces and avert peace at the start of the war before sabotaging the White Army's final chance to take Petrograd near the war's end:


https://books.google.com/books/?id=L1pDAQAAMAAJ&pg=PA61
>WHY PETROGRAD HAS NOT BEEN TAKEN

>...The initial main cause of the failure to take Petrograd had consisted in the faulty political organisation of the Russians managing the affairs of those attacking the Bolsheviks. According to the theory proceeded upon Admiral Kolchack, being situated in Siberia, has by general consent assumed the position of 'supreme ruler' of the Russians driven from Russia by the tyranny of the Bolsheviks. He is represented in the South of Russia by General Denikin, on the Petrograd front by General Yudenich, who had authority to 'carry on' without assuming any original responsibility on their own. Further, there was a 'political conference' representing Admiral Kolchak in Paris and consisting of M. Sazonov, former Minister of Foreign Affairs to Nicolas the Second, and four or five stray Russian politicians, using the word 'stray' in it strict sense as meaning those who have turned up by accident. ...As no important decision could be taken without the consent of Admiral Kolchack, and as evidently the Admiral could not in addition to his manifold trials on the Siberian front master the conditions north of Petrograd and south of Moscow, in practice every question was referred to the Russian representatives in Paris. Here the political council was at loggerheads. Prince Lyvov had the distinction of being the most ineffective of all the Ministers in the Russian Provisional Governments after the revolution; M. Tchaikovsky, a veteran of the struggle with despotism, was an enthusiast out of touch with actual conditions in Russia; M. Savinkov, the only man of ability and energy, was extremely distasteful to the Conservatives; consequently all business came into the hands of M. Sazonov.

>...Even however had Yudenich been able to take Petrograd alone, most people, including himself, thought that he would not be able to hold it unaided with so small a force as was at his disposal. ...help could only be obtained from one of two quarters, the Finns or the Esthonians. It was here that the political question came in. ...The services of Finland, ...if obtained, would be at a price. What the price was, all knew: the recognition by the Russians of her independence, together with modest territorial compensation and financial support in making the expedition. For this she would guarantee to take and hold Petrograd with troops that were fresh, hardy, loyal to the cause of order and buoyed by the knowledge that they had beaten the Reds in Finland and could beat them again in Russia. The Bolshevik dispositions on the Finnish front were known down to the last detail, and it was calculated that if they were pressed on the south of the Gulf of Finland too, the affair would be over in ten days, at most a fortnight. It was clear that the co-operation of Finland was essential to turn the capture of Petrograd from a gamble into a certainty ...and common prudence dictated obtaining it at the price of recognising what was already a *fait accompli*, namely the independence of Russia's small but stubborn northern neighbor

>...the first and best chance of taking Petrograd missed. But the chance of obtaining Finnish co-operation came again when General Yudenich started on his forlorn hope. His initial success was so striking that the Finnish army and the greater part of the nation was all agog to move ...After the suggestion of Finland's co-operation had first been scouted by Yudenich and his representatives in Finland and that co-operation had been solicited, but in so cavalier a form as to alienate valuable Finnish sympathy...


https://books.google.com/books?id=SagUAAAAIAAJ&pg=PA143
>...Up to now the government has followed and will continue to follow the same relations with the Russians. Finland cannot bind itself to give strategic guarantees to Sazonov. Kammerer's threats in this condition are rejected by various Entente diplomats here. Sazonov's offer to pay for the Petrograd expedition and to arrange for all other questions concerning Finland's demands are on the whole not adequate...


https://books.google.com/books/?id=L1pDAQAAMAAJ&pg=PA61
>...an urgent appeal was made to M. Sazonov to satisfy the Finish demands and so save the Russian situation. ...Privately [Sazonov] was known to have held the view that the recognition of Finnish independence was inadmissible and, it is said, even went to the ridiculous length of saying that he would never speak to General Mannerheim. Now, he took the opportunity to leave the appeal of General Yudenich, of the North-West Government, and of the Russian representatives in Finland unanswered at all events until Yudenich's force was beat back and the Finns would no longer have been willing to move. Nor was M. Sazonov alone in his obstinacy. Even then the question was actively discussed in Finland of a volunteer expedition against Petrograd. This was the moment chosen by Kerensky in Paris and Professor Miliukov in London separately to make statements to the effect that no one had the right to recognize the independence of Finland, thus completely antagonising the latter's growing sympathy with the Russians.


Petrograd was second in importance only to Moscow; had Finnish support come, and Petrograd been taken by the Whites, world history might have been very different. But Sazonov ignored Yudenich's plea to secure Finnish aid while the Bolsheviks drove the Whites out of Petrograd and away from hope of victory. When it looked like the Finns might decide to come anyway, Kerensky cooled hopes for a surprise Finnish initiative with an ill-timed insult.

Whatever their intentions, Sazonov and Kerensky often acted in ways that ended up helping the Bolsheviks. Sazonov's 1907 intrigues to dissolve the Duma further soured public opinion against the Tsar, and Kerensky's weakness during the Bolshevik's coup (among other things) is often cited in charges of his responsibility for their rise to power. Sazonov and Kerensky also worked in tandem to give the Bolsheviks a crucial propaganda win:


https://books.google.com/books?id=Hnb3CgAAQBAJ&pg=PT112&lpg=PT112
>The Milyukov crisis was the first test of Lenin's mettle after he arrived in Russia, and deserves a closer look. The issue of war aims was arguably *the* political question opened up by the February Revolution, even if it had been initially obscured in the popular euphoria over the fall of the tsar and his secret police. For what purpose, after all, were all those millions of wretched muzhiks fighting, bleeding and dying on fronts stretching from the Gulf of Finland to the Black Sea? While few in Russia, or anywhere else, yet suspected the full extent of the secret Ottoman partition plans agreed between then foreign minister Sergei Sazonov, Mark Sykes and Georges Picot in 1915-16, rumors were running hot, and getting hotter all the time. On 2 December 1916, then-chairman of the Council of Ministers A. F. Trepov, to quiet the usual mob of hecklers that had greeted his first Duma address, had revealed publicly for the first time that Britain and France had promised Russia Constantinople and the Straits. Realising the political potency of the issue, Kerensky had reportedly rifled through the Foreign Ministry archives after the tsar had abdicated in March for copies of these 'secret treaties', and then instructed the Provisional Committee of the Duma to 'Hide them!' Suspecting that the Provisional Government was indeed hiding something, Bolshevik factory committees in Petrograd had issued a series of resolutions demanding the publication of the secret treaties.


http://www.icl-fi.org/english/wv/971/qotw.html
>“Statement by Trotsky on the Publication of the Secret Treaties”

>...In publishing the secret diplomatic documents from the foreign policy archives of Tsarism and of the bourgeois coalition Governments of the first seven months of the revolution, we are carrying out the undertaking which we made when our party was in opposition. Secret diplomacy is a necessary tool for a propertied minority which is compelled to deceive the majority in order to subject it to its interests. Imperialism, with its dark plans of conquest and its robber alliances and deals, developed the system of secret diplomacy to the highest level. The struggle against the imperialism which is exhausting and destroying the peoples of Europe is at the same time a struggle against capitalist diplomacy... The Russian people, and the peoples of Europe and the whole world, should learn the documentary truth about the plans forged in secret by the financiers and industrialists... The peoples of Europe have paid for the right to this truth with countless sacrifices and universal economic desolation.


For the Bolsheviks, Sazonov's well-documented complicity in the infamous Sykes-Picot deal (notable for its disastrous effects on peace and stability in the Middle East) was proof of what their propaganda had been saying all along: that the war was not started for any noble reason like honor or defense of the homeland, but for the gain of an elite few. The provisional government's inexplicable decision not to release these documents on their own denied them an easy opportunity to throw cold water on Bolshevik accusations that the provisional government were mere puppets of imperialist warmongers while giving the Bolsheviks ammo to continue the same.

The Bolsheviks got many more lucky breaks throughout the course of the war, and not just from Kerensky's doughy lack of initiative. Had Sazanov and the German Foreign Ministry not acted to mobilize their respective armies, a wider war would likely had been avoided (if the Willy Nicky Telegrams tell us anything), and the war, the Bolsheviks' main prop for turning citizens against their governments, could very well have been over in a matter of months rather than years. Even after the Entente and Central powers had become locked in heavy fighting, there were missed chances for an early end to the war.

World War One, infamous for its grueling trench warfare, started out as a faster "war of movement." The Germans believed they had six weeks to defeat France before Russia would become too powerful to stop, and so their opening move was a sweeping kind of blitzkrieg across north eastern France, converging on Paris. The Schlieffen plan, as it was called, was an early success: by the sixth week, nervous French officials contemplated evacuation as the sound of German artillery echoed through Parisian streets.

But as the Germans met France's last line of defense at the river Marne, things began to go wrong. Field Marshall Bulow began shelling his own armies. Communications among field commanders and with the High Command were plagued with technical problems and human error:


https://books.google.com/books/about/The_Marne_1914.html
>Messages often arrived so mutilated at Bülow’s and Kluck’s headquarters that they had to be re-sent three or four times. Field telegraph stations managed to get only twenty-nine of fifty-nine reports from First Army’s fliers to Kluck and Kuhl between 1 and 5 September. There were no electronic ties between First and Second armies, or between them and their army corps and cavalry corps. ...No one thought of using airplanes to pass important orders along the line. The distance between Bülow’s headquarters at Montmort and Kluck’s at Vandrest (and later Mareuil), after all, was a mere fifty-five kilometers, or half an hour by air. The two commanders were thus effectively cut off from discussing the rapidly developing situation with each other—and with Moltke, who was 435 kilometers by automobile* away from Second Army headquarters and 445 from First Army headquarters.

>Interestingly, Tappen rejected all suggestions that the OHL, or at least a small operations staff, move up to the front behind the German right wing on the grounds of “technical difficulties as well as stodginess.”68 One can only speculate whether Moltke, for his part, remembered that in 1866 his uncle had supervised the movements of his armies during the Battle of Königgrätz from the Roskosberg, above the Bistritz River, and that he had likewise led from the front in 1870 during the Battle of Sedan from a ridge high above the Meuse River near Frénois.


Cheif of the General Staff Helmuth von Moltke, in an apparent fit of nervousness, moved two divisions to the Eastern front and issued a vague and inconsistent "General Directive" to his armies while declining to move to the front to direct them. Then things got worse:


http://images.mentalfloss.com/sites/default/files/styles/insert_main_wide_image/public/marne_sept_7.jpg

https://books.google.com/books/about/The_Marne_1914.html
>Within hours, the lack of command and control from Luxembourg became manifestly evident. At the very moment that Moltke and Tap-pen were drafting their General Directive calling on Third Army to drive on Troyes-Vendeuvre, Hausen at 5 PM on 4 September informed the OHL that he had ordered a day of rest for his forces. He repeated the message an hour later. “Troops desperately need a day of rest.” He did not budge from his decision when the two flanking armies, Second and Fourth, informed him that they were resuming the offensive early the next morning. He stood firm even after he belatedly received Moltke’s instruction to advance on Troyes-Vendeuvre at eight o’clock that night. 

>Just before midnight, he informed the OHL for a third time in less than seven hours that Third Army would rest on 5 September. Moltke raised no objections.

>...Every other German army had marched relentlessly under a searing sun during the last month. Every other army had suffered heavy casualties. Every other army needed rest and resupply. Some had in fact marched much greater distances than Third Army: First Army 500 kilometers and Second Army 440.

>...It was now the thirty-fifth day of mobilization. Schlieffen had prescribed victory on the thirty-ninth or fortieth day...

>...Realizing that First Army’s three (under strength) corps on the Ourcq were too weak to mount a counterattack against 150,000 French soldiers, they turned to Bülow. Shortly after 8 AM on 7 September, they telegraphed Second Army headquarters at Champaubert: “II, IV and IV Reserve Corps heavily engaged west of the lower Ourcq. Where III and IX Army Corps? What is your situation?” No reply. They repeated the message, adding “Urgently request answer.” It crossed paths with a radiogram from Second Army wishing to know, “What is your situation?” Finally, a third request from Kuhl, “Engagement III and IX Corps at the Ourcq urgently required.”65 No reply.

>...Kluck and Kuhl could wait no longer. Still without a reply from Bülow to their request for reinforcements, they seized the initiative and ordered Ewald von Lochow’s III Corps and Quast’s IX Corps, both temporarily assigned to Bülow, to leave Second Army’s right wing in broad daylight and quick-march to the Ourcq.71 For Kuhl had decided to master what now threatened to be assaults on both his wings by way of an all-out offensive on the right, designed to crush Maunoury’s Sixth Army before the BEF could engage German First or Second army.

>Incredibly, neither Kluck nor Kuhl was aware that General von Bülow shortly after midnight on 7 September had already pulled back his right wing, fearing that his soldiers were too exhausted to ward off another French frontal attack. Bülow withdrew III and IX corps of First Army as well as his own X Reserve Corps fifteen to twenty kilometers behind the shelter, such as it was, of the Petit Morin River—some eight hours before First Army’s duumvirate ordered them to march to the Ourcq. Bülow radioed Moltke of his action at 2 AM. He declined to inform Kluck via dispatch rider.

>...the German position on the Marne and the Ourcq defies rational analysis...

>Without firm direction from the OHL, both commanders had developed their own operational concepts. ...Bülow made no effort to coordinate the operations of the two “strike” armies or to bring Moltke fully into the calculus.

>...For the Germans, 7 September was the critical day in the Battle of the Marne. Kluck and Kuhl, as noted previously, had hastily taken II and IV corps out of the line on the Marne and rushed them north to aid Gronau’s corps on the Ourcq. Bülow had then withdrawn III and IX corps as well as X Reserve Corps behind the Petit Morin—only to have had Kluck and Kuhl eight hours later order III and IX corps to leave Bülow’s right wing and to march north in order to help defeat Maunoury’s French Sixth Army. None of these orders was shared, much less discussed beforehand. In the process, as is well known, Bülow, Kluck, and Kuhl had created a fifty-kilometer-wide gap between First and Second armies—one into which the BEF was slowly stumbling

>...At Luxembourg, General von Moltke yet again was on the verge of panic. “Today a great decision will come about,” he wrote his wife, Eliza, on 7 September, “since yesterday our entire army is fighting from Paris to Upper Alsace. Should I have to give my life today to bring about victory, I would do it gladly a thousand times.” He lamented the “streams of blood” that had already been shed and the “countless” homes and lives that had been destroyed. “I often shudder when I think of this and I feel as though I need to accept responsibility for this dreadfulness. …”75 These were not the words of a great captain.

>...In three days and while outnumbering the enemy at least ten to one, “Johnnie” French’s army had advanced just forty kilometers. The BEF’s importance lay in its role as an “army in being,” to borrow a naval term.

>...The Allied advance into the fifty-kilometer-wide space between First and Second armies drove Moltke ever deeper into despair. He issued no orders to either Bülow or Kluck on 6 or 7 September. Instead, he withdrew into a world of self-pity and grief. The “burden of responsibility of the last several days,” he wrote his wife, was impossible even to name. “For the great battle of our army along its entire front has not yet been decided.” The “horrible tension” of the last few days, the “absence of news from the far distant armies,” and “knowing all that was at stake” was “almost beyond human power” to comprehend. “The terrible difficulty of our situation stands like an almost impenetrable black wall in front of me.”

>...Bülow’s X Corps had pounded Dubois’s IX Corps at Saint-Prix and his Guard Corps had violently assaulted IX Corps at Bannes on 6 and 7 September; he now urged Third Army to exploit the gap. It would require a major effort by an army down to 2,105 officers and 81,199 ranks.100

>Yet again, Hausen prevaricated. It was the dilemma of Dinant all over again. On his right, Plettenberg’s 2d Guard Division had stalled at Normée. Bülow again called for relief. “Strongest possible support 3 Army urgently desired. The day’s decision depends [on this].” On Hausen’s left, Heinrich von Schenck’s XVIII Corps of Fourth Army likewise had been stopped in its tracks around Vitry-le-François, and Duke Albrecht called for assistance.102 Whom to obey? A royal prince? Prussia’s senior army commander? Or Moltke, who had ordered Third Army to march on Troyes-Vendeuvre? As at Dinant, Hausen decided to please all suitors: He divided his army. He ordered Maximilian von Laffert’s XIX Corps to support Schenck’s VIII Corps at Glannes; he approved Karl d’Elsa’s prior decision to rush 32d ID as well as the artillery of 23d ID to aid the Guard Corps at Clamanges-Lenharré; and he instructed his remaining forces (mainly 23d ID and 24th RID released by the fall of Fortress Givet) to continue on to Troyes-Vendeuvre. He declined to use Fourth Army’s direct telephone to Luxembourg to seek Moltke’s input.

>Hausen justified his actions in his unpublished memoirs. Orders were orders. He could not disobey a direct command from Bülow, or from Duke Albrecht, or from Moltke, even if it meant splitting his army into three separate entities.

>For a third time since Fumay and Sommesous–Sompuis–Vitry-le-François, Hausen lost a splendid opportunity to drive an attack through the French line. The day of rest he had generously given his troops on 5 September now came home to roost: He was too far behind Second and Fourth armies on his flanks to rush to the immediate aid of either, and he was too far from the fighting front to penetrate Foch’s weak spot. By dividing his forces, he forwent any attempt to envelop French Ninth Army. By having halted on 5 September, he had given away the chance to break through the fifteen-kilometer-wide gap between Foch’s Ninth Army and Langle de Cary’s Fourth Army.104 One can only imagine what Hans von Gronau would have done under the circumstances.

>...Bülow promised 2nd GD (later also 1st GD) for Kirchbach’s right wing. Hausen now commanded six and one-half army corps...

>...General von Hausen’s supporters have depicted him as a “gifted army commander” who sought to bring about a small Cannae at the eleventh hour, and they have seen in his night attack an example of operational art to be emulated by the rest of the German army.126 Yet even at the tactical level, its wisdom remains questionable in light of the fact that it was carried out across a river at night, without reconnaissance of enemy positions, without prior shelling, without artillery support during the advance, and with unloaded rifles.

>...At that very moment, a visitor from the OHL arrived at First Army headquarters: Lieutenant Colonel Richard Hentsch, on what undoubtedly is the most famous staff tour in military history.

>...“IF THE PESSIMISTIC OBERSTLEUTNANT HENTSCH HAD CRASHED INTO a tree … somewhere on his journey of 8 September, or if he had been shot by a French straggler, we would have had a ceasefire two weeks later and thereafter would have received a peace in which we could have asked for everything.”...

>...U.S. Army chief of staff Peyton C. March after the war expressed amazement that Germany’s senior army commanders had readily obeyed orders from “a perfectly unknown lieutenant colonel … far exceeding his authority,” and suggested that the Allies erect a monument in their “Hall of Fame” to honor Hentsch.

>...THE MOOD AT THE OHL on the morning of 8 September can only be described as bordering on panic.13 Moltke had received no word from First or Second armies the past two days. Both were reported to be within striking distance of Paris, yet one (First) had cut sharply across the front of the other (Second) at the Marne. French chief of the General Staff Joseph Joffre had launched a massive counterattack along the entire front from Paris to Verdun. A new French Sixth Army seemed to be trying to envelop First Army’s right flank on the Ourcq. The British Expeditionary Force (BEF) ever so slowly was marching into the fifty-kilometer-wide gap between First and Second armies. Moltke, fearing that First Army had already been attacked in the rear and was in danger of being ground up between French Sixth Army and the BEF, desperately needed clarity.

>During the intense discussions among the four officers—Moltke, Tappen, Hentsch, and Dommes—in Tappen’s office, Moltke most likely gave Hentsch powers to initiate a general withdrawal of the right wing to the line Sainte-Menehould–Reims–Fismes–Soissons if First Army’s predicament made such a move “necessary.” Hentsch took this to constitute “full power of authority” (Vollmacht) to act in Moltke’s name.

>...he was off to Second Army headquarters at Montmort-Lucy, where he arrived at 6:45 PM. Bülow returned from his command post at Fromentières half an hour later. The ensuing meeting was greatly to shape the Battle of the Marne.

>On arriving at the Château de Montmort, Hentsch’s cautious optimism waned. The shafts of the wagons of Second Army’s headquarters staff all pointed north, an indication of a planned withdrawal.

>...At this point in the discussion, either Bülow or Matthes uttered what soon became a fateful word, “Schlacke.”25 Captain König reiterated this fact in formal replies to the historians of the Reichsarchiv in March 1925 and January 1926, and on both occasions testified that the word cinders had been applied to Second Army.

>...All present at the meeting agreed that First Army’s situation was “desperate;” none had faith that Kluck’s right wing could envelop Maunoury’s left. Furthermore, all agreed that the last possible moment to order a general retreat would come as soon as major Allied forces crossed the Marne. For reasons that he never explained, Hentsch decided to spend the night at Montmort rather than to push on to First Army headquarters.

>...Bülow, having risen and been briefed by Lauenstein and Matthes on their talks with Hentsch, reviewed the morning’s reconnaissance report from Lieutenant Berthold of Flying Squadron 23. It confirmed his worst fears: “Advance by 5 hostile columns in a northerly direction in the region of Montmirail—La Ferté.”31 They were obviously advancing from the Petit Morin toward the Marne into the gap between First and Second armies. For Bülow, the last moment to order a general retreat had arrived. “Second Army initiates retreat,” he tersely informed Hausen and Kluck on his left and right, respectively, at 9:02 AM, “right flank on Damery [sic].”32 When shortly thereafter a message arrived from Mareuil stating that First Army was withdrawing its left flank (Alexander von Linsingen’s II Corps) toward Coulombs, Bülow (incorrectly) assumed that this was because Hentsch had ordered Kluck also to begin the withdrawal.33 Bad communications yet again bedeviled the Germans.

>How does one account for the bizarre meeting at Montmort? On the surface, it seems ludicrous that a mere lieutenant colonel was able to move Prussia’s most senior field commander into ordering his army to retreat without having suffered a major defeat. Even more ludicrous is that Bülow made absolutely no effort to contact either Moltke at Luxembourg or Kluck at Mareuil—by telegraph, rider, automobile, or airplane. Incredibly, four trains of Bülow’s Telephone Section 2 sat idle at Dormans studying handbooks on how to install and repair lines and equipment; they took no steps whatsoever to establish telephone communications with Kluck, less than sixty kilometers away as the crow flies.

>...Surely, Bülow and Lauenstein could, and should, have overruled a lieutenant colonel and taken responsibility for coordinating their intended action with the OHL and First Army.

>The truth of the matter is that the order to retreat was issued not by Hentsch or by Moltke, but by Bülow, with whom responsibility for setting in motion the German retreat from the Marne must rest.

>Some scholars have viewed Bülow’s decision on the fourth day of the battle to avert a pending “catastrophe” by way of a timely retreat as “a sound one.”35 At the time, Lauenstein crowed to Deputy Chief of Staff von Stein that “Germany will one day thank General von Bülow that he issued the order to retreat.”36 Few German military writers, either at the time or subsequently, have agreed with either view. They are right.

>Quite apart from the sudden and impulsive nature of the decision and Bülow’s refusal to seek input from Moltke or Kluck, it did not correspond to the situation on the ground. There had been no major breakthrough. Kluck was rallying his army corps to crush French Sixth Army on the Ourcq. Rudolf von Lepel’s infantry brigade, marching southwest from Brussels, was about to strike Maunoury’s left flank. Second Army had merely to close up its front and stand firm at the Marne.

>...General von Kuhl, First Army’s chief of staff, met Hentsch on a dusty road at Mareuil. ...Hentsch then made his formal presentation. Fifth Army was tied down at Verdun; Sixth and Seventh armies likewise were pinned at Nancy-Épinal; and Bülow’s VII Corps had not “withdrawn” behind the Marne but had been “hurled” back across the river. To wit, the time for a general retreat had come.

>...Kuhl “vigorously” objected.43 First Army’s right wing was about to break Maunoury’s left; the attack had to be given a chance to succeed; a retreat by his exhausted and disorganized forces was out of the question. And how, he demanded to know, had Bülow come to retreat behind the Marne? Hentsch obfuscated. “The decision to retreat,” he coldly replied, “had been a bitter pill for Old Bülow to swallow.”

>He then repeated the unsubstantiated but critical comment made by either Bülow or Matthes at Montmort that Second Army had been reduced to “cinders” by Franchet d’Espèrey’s vicious attacks. Finally, Hentsch pulled his ace out of his sleeve: He had come with “full power of authority” and “in the name of the Oberste-Heeresleitung” ordered First Army to retreat. It was less than a clinical staff performance.

>...Kuhl had no direct telephone line to Luxembourg, and he chose not to use one of his aircraft to send a staff officer to Montmort to confer with Bülow or Lauenstein. Later on, he simply informed Kluck of his discussion with Hentsch. “With a heavy heart, General von Kluck was obliged to accept the order.”

>...Hentsch, “psychologically deeply shaken” by the gravity of his action and fearful that he would be “blamed for the unfortunate termination of the [Schlieffen-Moltke] operation,”46 departed Mareuil at 1 PM—not to brief Second Army on his discussions with Kuhl but to inform Third, Fourth, and Fifth armies of the decision to retreat.

>...at around 9 AM, Lieutenant Colonel Hentsch arrived at Varennes on the return leg of his tour of the front. Arguing that Second Army had been reduced to “cinders"...

>...chief of staff, General Walther von Lüwitz, lectured Moltke that a major withdrawal would have a decimating “moral effect” on the troops.

>Then the proverbial bolt from the blue: Just as Tappen was drafting orders for Fifth, Fourth, and Third armies to maintain their positions, his staff overheard a relayed radio message from Bülow at Second Army headquarters to the OHL. “Enemy appears to want to direct his main offensive against the right flank and center of Third Army” in an obvious attempt to break through at Vitry-le-François.102 A “deeply shaken” Moltke saw no reason to doubt Bülow. The only countermeasure was to withdraw the entire German center to the line Suippes–Sainte-Menehould

>...He instructed Second Army to fall back to Thuizy (southeast of Reims), Third Army to the line Thuizy-Suippes, Fourth Army to Suippes–Sainte-Menehould, and Fifth Army to east of Sainte-Menehould. This would essentially become the stationary trench line of the Western Front.

>...To the German soldiers at the sharp end of the stick, the order to retreat seemed grotesque. They did not feel like a beaten army. Georg Wichura, whose 5th ID for days had valiantly held up the advance of the BEF and the French cavalry corps between Monbertoin and Montreuil-aux-Lions, was “decimated” by the order. The “mood swing” among his men was “terrible, everywhere confused looks.” “A thousand serious thoughts went through their heads,” the division’s diary noted. “Legs like lead. Silent and exhausted, as if in a trance, the column plods on ahead.”116 Similar reactions were noted at Third Army. The order to retreat arrived like a “bolt of thunder” at 133d RIR. Its commander, Lieutenant Colonel Schmidt, recalled, “I saw many men cry, the tears rolled down their cheeks; others simply expressed amazement.” Lieutenant Colonel Wilke of 178th IR noted “understandable shrugging of shoulders, sad shaking of heads. … Finally, it all turned into a dumbfounded silence filled with ominous anticipation.”117 The general feeling among the Saxon troops was that “it was not our fault, we stood our ground.”

>...It began at the Marne in 1914. It ended at Versailles in 1919. In between, about sixty million young men had been mobilized, ten million killed, and twenty million wounded. With the 20/20 vision of hindsight, the great tragedy of the Marne is that it was strategically indecisive. Had German First Army destroyed French Sixth Army east of Paris; had French Fifth Army and the BEF driven through the gap between German First and Second armies expeditiously; had French Fifth Army pursued German Second Army more energetically beyond the Marne; then perhaps the world would have been spared the greater catastrophe that was to follow in 1939–45.


As the Germans engaged the French at Marne, Field Marshal Hausen and Field Marshal Bulow inexplicably stayed behind. Hausen later split his army in an attempt to follow three orders at once and led a bayonet charge with unloaded rifles across a river. Bulow ordered his corps to withdraw while Marshall Kluck ordered some to advance, with neither aware of the other's orders nor making any attempt to coordinate with Moltke. Moltke sent Colonel Hentsch to check the armies and decide on a general retreat, only for Bulow to decide to retreat on his own. Hentsch, despite having no contact with Bulow after his decision to retreat, tells Kluck that Bulow has already retreated and that its time for him to retreat too. Hentsch then skips updating Bulow on Kluck's status and orders the rest of the armies to retreat. Just as Lüwitz and Tappen are trying to convince Moltke to hold the line, Bulow radios in with news of a new French offensive. Moltke, "deeply shaken," orders a full retreat. Even though Bulow, unusually, doesn't blow up any bridges behind him, the French fail to pursue or do any serious damage to the retreating German army. With neither side making any decisive gains, the Germans retreat to a fortified line that remains more or less stationary for the rest of the war.

As Herwig writes, the great tragedy of the Battle of Marne is that neither side capitalized on the others mistakes--had the BEF been a little faster, they might have breached the gap in the German lines and surrounded their armies. If the French had pursued and destroyed the retreating Germans, they might have done enough damage to bring the Germans to negotiate. Had the Germans not retreated, they might have taken Paris. These opportunities missed, the battle failed to be decisive for either side. Instead, Marne was decisive in how it shaped the rest of the war: the war of movement on the Western Front became trench warfare for four long years.

By some German military historians' analysis, the Germans had already lost the war by September 1914. The German government, however, made no attempt to negotiate for peace.

After Marne, General Erich von Falkenhayn replaced Moltke as Chief of the General Staff. Falkenhayn's career there, unfortunately, was a repeat of Moltke's string of failures to capitalize on opportunities to quickly end the war, this time on a strategic scale:


http://digitalcommons.brockport.edu/cgi/viewcontent.cgi?article=1000&context=hashtaghistory
>...Moltke was replaced by Erich von Falkenhayn, whom the Kaiser personally knew and trusted. The appointment of Falkenhayn was not well received by the rest of the High Command, and he became increasingly loathed as the war progressed and Germany failed to break through in the West.

>...General Falkenhayn believed that Germany should focus its efforts on breaking through in the Western Front. They were close to achieving this at the Marne, and he believed that by transferring troops from the East to the West, that break through could be achieved.  However, General Ludendorff and his like-minded partner Paul Von Hindenburg believed that Germany’s forces should concentrate on the Eastern Front since they had already achieved major victories over the Russians at the Battles of Tannenberg, Lodz, and the Masurian Lakes in 1914-1915. Ludendorff was adamant that if Falkenhayn diverted troops to the Eastern Front, he would be able to completely encircle the Russians at Lodz at the bend of Vistula River and achieve the knockout blow that Germany sought. Falkenhayn, however, was narrowly focused on the West. He dismissed Ludendorff’s pleas and after the war commented on the subject stating that, “It was a grave mistake to believe that our western enemies would give way, if, and because Russia was beaten. No decision in the East, even though it were as thorough as it was possible to imagine, could spare us from fighting to a conclusion in the West.”

>Falkenhayn was the Chief of the General Staff and outranked Ludendorff.  He ignored Ludendorff’s protests and launched a second assault on the French city of Ypres, which was repulsed with heavy casualties. Yet even after this defeat, Falkenhayn’s resolve did not waver. As a result, by the end of 1915 the Russian armies were severely weakened but crucially still in the field, while Germany continued to fight an exhausting war on two fronts. The commanders in the Eastern Theatre were appalled by this series of unfortunate events and resorted to name-calling and petty hostility to Falkenhayn.

>...The successful German Gorlice - Tornow Offensive of May 1915 was a major blow to Russian morale. The Russian Tsar, Nicholas II, declared himself front - line supreme commander to inspire the faltering troops. 49 Consequently, each subsequent Russian defeat was blamed on the Tsar and his government. Had Falkenhayn transferred the required battalions to the east at the Battle of Lodz, the Russian army would have been completely annihilated ...A decisive defeat at the Battle of Lodz could have produced a political and social crisis significant enough to bring Russia to the negotiating table. With Russia out of the war in 1915, the Central Powers would not have resorted to the question of unrestricted submarine warfare because of the Allied economic blockade, denying the excuse for America to join the war, and allowing most of the eastern forces to bolster the west for a true knockout blow that the High Command desired.


Falkenhayn was obsessed with getting a breakthrough on the Western Front, even at the expense of missed opportunities to knock Russia out of the war. Even on the Eastern Front, Falkenhayn sought to pull troops from Russia to attack Serbia. If Falkanhayn had committed the requested forces to Lodz, Russia would have surrendered and Falkanhayn would have had enough forces for his Western Front breakthrough.

Falkenhayn's breakthrough never came. His major offensive at Verdun didn't go as planned, in part due to communications failures and stubborn field commanders, reminiscent of the tragedy at Marne:


http://digitalcommons.brockport.edu/cgi/viewcontent.cgi?article=1000&context=hashtaghistory
>In order to end the war using his new strategy of “bleeding the French white,” Falkenhayn chose the fortress of Verdun as the target for his next attack. Although this battle is traditionally remembered today as an atrocious meat grinder that amounted to little more than needless bloodshed, the battle was never intended to develop the way it did.

>...Falkenhayn kept a large force in reserve to thwart the eventual Allied counterattack, and believed that his heavy artillery could produce enough casualties to bring the French to the negotiating table. However, miscommunication and disagreement between Falkenhayn and the commanders of the German 5th army undermined this unique plan for limited victory.

>The commanders of the 5th army, who represented the brunt of the German assault believed that they should employ artillery on the three available sides surrounding Verdun. Artillery would be used to thoroughly bombard Verdun, and then the 5th army could take it. The attack order given to troops on January 27, 1916 urged the soldiers to fight much more aggressively than Falkenhayn intended. “The entire battle for the fortress of Verdun depends upon the attack never coming to a halt, thereby preventing the French from ever having the opportunity to construct new positions in their rear and reorganizing their shattered resistance.

>Falkenhayn did not want to risk such a complicated three - prong attack, and instead told the 5th army to limit their attack on just the east bank of the Meuse River; after - all, it didn’t matter if they took the fortress, they just needed to be in a desirable position and provoke an Allied counterattack.

>The discord between Falkenhayn and the 5th army produced disastrous consequences for the German forces. Although the initial wave of attacks against Verdun were successful in inflicting massive casualties on the French, Falkenhayn refused to deploy his reserve force to shatter the faltering French line. Crown Prince Wilhelm, the son of the Kaiser, was one of the commanding generals of the 5th army and after the battle he lamented that:

>>On the evening of the 24 February, the resistance of the enemy was actually broken; the path to Verdun was open!... We were so close to a complete victory! However, I lacked the reserves for an immediate and ruthless exploitation of the success we had achieved. The troops, who had been engaged in unbroken, heavy combat for 4 days, were no longer in the condition to do so. Thus, the psychological moment passed unused.

>Falkenhayn’s reluctance to commit his reserves on time allowed the Franco - British forces to reinforce the area. The Germans were halted well short of the line Falkenhayn wished to hold to conduct his offensive - defensive battle, and the French were content to bombard the Germans with their own artillery from the west bank of the Meuse.

>The Battle of Verdun dragged on with mounting casualties, but the numbers were not lopsided enough to produce the political effect Falkenhayn hoped for. The initiative was finally called off on December 17, 1916.


Instead of "bleeding the French White," the battle of Verdun bled both sides with horrific casualties:


https://www.britannica.com/event/Battle-of-Verdun
>...As the French defense was reorganized, the Germans captured the undefended Fort Douaumont, arguably the most formidable of the strongpoints surrounding Verdun. Eight months would pass and much blood would be shed before the French could reclaim the fort.

>...On June 1 the Germans attacked Vaux and Thiaumont, two strongpoints in the French line on the right bank. After days of back-and-forth combat, the Germans captured both positions on June 9, but they were unable to carry their attack through to the defensive works south of Thiaumont. Fighting on the left bank was largely inconclusive, but on June 15 the French reclaimed roughly a little more than a half mile (one kilometre) of trenches on Le Mort Homme. Such minor gains, which came at an enormous cost in lives, would typify the horrors of trench warfare on the Western Front.

>...The preliminaries of the great Franco-British offensive on the Somme started on June 24 with a weeklong artillery barrage. The general Allied infantry assault began on July 1, and the British suffered nearly 60,000 casualties—with 20,000 killed—on the first day alone.
>
>...From February 21 to June 15, the French army had fielded 66 divisions at Verdun; by December 1916, roughly 75 percent of the French army had seen action on the Meuse. From February through July, the Germans had used 43 divisions. French guns at Verdun fired over 10,000,000 rounds with the field artillery, over 1,000,000 medium-calibre rounds, and 600,000 large-calibre rounds. At the conclusion of this enormous expenditure of blood and treasure, the lines were little changed from where they had been in early February.

>...In September, Gen. Charles Mangin, who had held command of a section of the French defensive line from Fleury to the right bank of the Meuse from June 22, proposed a scheme to liberate the Verdun region. Nivelle approved, and that offensive was initiated on October 21 with an artillery barrage across a broad front. An infantry assault followed on October 24, with three divisions advancing behind a creeping artillery barrage. By that evening the French had retaken Douaumont along with 6,000 German prisoners, and by November 2 the fort at Vaux was once again in French hands. Mangin was a gifted strategist, but he was widely regarded as a spendthrift when it came to the lives of his men, and his commitment to offensive warfare at any cost earned him the nickname “the Butcher.”

>...Over 10 months in 1916, the two armies at Verdun suffered over 700,000 casualties, including some 300,000 killed. The pastoral landscape surrounding the city had been permanently transformed, and nine villages—Beaumont, Bezonvaux, Cumières, Douaumont, Fleury, Haumont, Louvemont, Ornes, and Vaux—were entirely destroyed. After the war the villages were memorialized as having “died for France” and, although uninhabited, continued to be administered by mayors to preserve their existence as administrative entities. The unknown dead were commemorated at the Douaumont Ossuary, a monument completed in 1932 that contains the remains of 150,000 unidentified French and German soldiers.


The French and German armies suffered more than 700,000 casualties over 10 months, and Verdun became synonymous with senseless slaughter. If Falkenhayn had troops to spare to knock Russia out of the war before, it was not certain he did now. 

Germany's military blunders made the war bloodier and probably much longer, while also having the effect of keeping Russia just barely able to stay in the war. Russia's string of military defeats and strained economy therefore brought a particular stress and sense of hopelessness to the Russian people--fertile soil for the Bolsheviks' propaganda, especially in the army:


https://www2.warwick.ac.uk/fac/soc/economics/staff/mharrison/public/rgwr_postprint.pdf
>Russia’s Home Front

>Between 1913 and 1919 a country with the largest territory, the third largest population, and the fourth largest economy of any in the world was reduced to an average level not seen in Europe since the Middle Ages, and found today only in the poorest countries of Africa and Asia. By the time recovery was under way, 13 million people – nearly one in ten of the prewar population – had suffered premature death.


http://alphahistory.com/russianrevolution/july-days/
>...Between April and June 1917, the Bolshevik party was engaged in consolidating its position, recruiting new members and building support. Of particular importance was extending Bolshevik influence in the Petrograd Soviet, where the majority was still held by Menshevik and SR delegates. Lenin’s preferred tactic was to wait patiently while the party strengthened, while continuing to attack the government with propaganda and rhetoric and to promote the Soviets as the alternative government. But events in mid-1917 were fuelling the tinderbox of popular revolution faster than Lenin would have preferred. The Provisional Government’s adherence to the war radicalised thousands of soldiers and heightened calls for a Soviet revolution. On June 18th one military unit, the 1st Infantry Reserve, drafted resolutions calling for the overthrow of the government:

>>The slaughter continues and there is an industrial collapse in the making. We see the rich lining their pockets from this criminal war and we sense and know that a sinister and terrible famine is approaching. We also see the jackals from the State Duma and State Council reaching out with their filthy paws to strangle freedom. The rights of the soldier are falling by the wayside; so is the reinforcement of the rights of freedom… We hotly protest any kind of bourgeois ministry and we demand that the ten bourgeois [ministers] make way. We demand that the All-Russian Soviet of Soldiers’, Workers’ and Peasants’ Deputies seize all power.


https://archive.org/stream/russianturmoilme00deniuoft/russianturmoilme00deniuoft_djvu.txt
>The relief came at last. Captain Bouravin, the Commander of the Fifth Company, came into the hut. Albov offered to show him the section and explain the disposition of the enemy. 

>" Very well, though that does not matter, because I am not really in command of the Company — I am boycotted." 

>" How? " 

>" Just so. They have elected the 2nd Lieutenant, my subaltern, as Company Commander, and degraded me as a supporter of the old regime, because, you see, I had drill twice a day — you know that the marching contingents come up here absolutely untrained. Indeed, the 2nd Lieutenant was the first to vote for my removal. ' We have been slave-driven long enough/ said he. ' Now we are free. We must clean out everyone, beginning with the head. A young man can manage the regiment just as well, so long as he is a true Democrat and supports the freedom of the soldier.' I would have left, but the Colonel flatly refused to allow it, and forbids me to hand over the company. So now, you see, we have two commanders. I have stood the situation for five days.


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/apr/x02.htm#s12
>Political Parties in Russia and the Tasks of the Proletariat

>...

>12) SHOULD OFFICERS BE ELECTED BY THE SOLDIERS?

>>A. (to the right oi the C.D.) and B. (C.D.). No. That would be detrimental to the landowners and capitalists. If the soldiers cannot be pacified otherwise, they must be temporarily promised this reform, but it must be withdrawn at the earliest possible moment.

>>C. (S.D. and S.R.). Yes, they should.

>>D. (“Bolsheviks”). Not only must they be elected, but every step of every officer and general must be supervised by persons specially elected for the purpose by the soldiers. 

>13) IS IT DESIRABLE FOR THE SOLDIERS, ON THEIR OWN DECISION, TO DISPLACE THEIR SUPERIORS?

>>A. (to the right of the C.D.) and B. (C.D.). It is distinctly harmful. Guchkov has already forbidden it. He has already threatened to use force. Guchkov must be supported.

>>C. (S.D. and S.R.). It is. But it is not clear whether they should be replaced before the matter is taken up with the Contact Commission, or vice versa.

>>D. (“Bolsheviks”). It is desirable and essential in every way. The soldiers will obey and respect only elected authorities. 


https://archive.org/stream/russianturmoilme00deniuoft/russianturmoilme00deniuoft_djvu.txt
>Look here, Albov, you are not in a hurry, are you? Very good, then ; let us have a chat. I am feeling depressed. Albov, have you not yet thought of suicide? " 

>"Not as yet."

>Bouravin rose to his feet. 

>"Understand me, they have desecrated my soul, outraged my human dignity, and so every day, every hour, in every word, glance or gesture one sees a constant outrage. What have I done to them ? I have been in the service for eight years ; I have no family, no house or home. All this I have found in the regiment, my own regiment. Twice I have been badly wounded, and before my wounds were healed have rushed back to the regiment — so there you are ! And I loved the soldier— I am ashamed to speak of it myself, but they must remember how, more than once, I have crept out under the barbed wire to drag in the wounded. And now ! Well, yes, I reverence the regimental flag and hate their crimson rags. I accept the Revolution. But to me Russia is infinitely dearer than the Revolution. All these Committees and meetings, all this adventitious rubbish which has been sown in the Army I am organically unable to swallow and digest. But, after all, I interfere with no one; I say nothing of this to anyone, I strive to convince no one. If only the War could be ended honourably, and then I am ready to break stones on the highway, only not to remain in an Army democratised in such a manner."


The propagandizing and demoralizing of the Russian army over the war's four year grind was of great importance to the Russian revolution and socialist revolutions around the world. Soldiers, for one, by necessity must travel great distances and meet people along the way, and so were ideal for spreading the Bolsheviks' message. Accordingly, Bolshevik propaganda instructed soldiers to spread propaganda to villages and even foreign armies, and one can find examples of Russian soldiers agitating for mutiny in France or fraternizing and sharing socialist ideas on the Eastern Front. 

Of more immediate importance, the Bolshevik revolution would have been put down should the Russian government have had a larger loyal fighting force than the Bolsheviks, and so winning-over, demoralizing, or incapacitating as many Russian soldiers as possible would have been an essential task for the Bolsheviks.

Lenin, who advocated for the defeat of the Russian government to convert the "imperialist war" into a "class struggle," took that idea to it's logical conclusion--arguably, the main army of the Bolshevik revolution was not the Red Guards, but the Germans:


http://alphahistory.com/russianrevolution/july-days/
>A dangerous situation was made worse by a disastrous military offensive. It was authorised in mid-June by Alexander Kerensky, since been ‘promoted’ to the Provisional Government’s war minister. In mid-June Kerensky approved a massive assault on Austro-Hungarian defences in Galicia. Kerensky’s decision to attack seems to have been motivated by the arrival of dozens of heavy artillery pieces from Britain and Japan; he also hoped to improve morale, both in the ranks of the army and in Russia generally. The first two days of the ‘Kerensky Offensive’, as it became known, was more successful than not, as the Allied guns blasted openings in the Austro-Hungarian defences that allowed Russian infantrymen to make early advances. But the offensive soon encountered stronger resistance from German units and began to collapse. By mid-July the Russians had suffered 400,000 casualties and were forced to retreat, surrendering more than 200 kilometres.


https://archive.org/stream/russianturmoilme00deniuoft/russianturmoilme00deniuoft_djvu.txt
>"In spite of its enormous numerical and technical superiority, the 11th Army was retreating uninterruptedly. On the 8th of July it had already reached the Serenth, never halting at the very strong fortified position to the West of the river, which had been our starting point in the glorious advance of 1916. Bohm-Ermolli had detached some of his forces for the pursuit of the Russian troops in the direction of Tarnapol and had moved his main forces southwards between the Serenth and the Strypa, threatening to cut off the communication of the 7th Army, to throw them into the Dniester and, perhaps, cut off the retreat of the 8th Army. On July 9th the Austro-Germans had already reached Mikulinze, a distance of one march south of Tarnapol.

>...On July 10th the Austro-Germans advanced to the line Mikulinze-Podgaitze-Stanilavov. On the 11th the Germans occupied Tarnapol, abandoned without fighting by the 1st Guards Army Corps. On the next day they broke through our position on the rivers Gniezno and Sereth, South of Trembovlia, and developed their advance in the Eastern and South-Eastern directions. On the same day, pursuing the 7th and 8th Armies, the enemy occupied the line from the Sereth to Monsaterjisko- Tlumatch.

>On the 12th July, seeing that the position was desperate, the Commander-in-Chief issued orders for a retreat from the Sereth, and by the 21st the Armies of the South-Western Front, having cleared Galicia and Bukovina, reached the Russian frontier. Their retreat was marked by fires, violence, murders and plunder. A few units, however, fought the enemy stubbornly and covered the retreat of the maddened mob of deserters by sacrificing their lives. Among them were Russian officers, whose bodies covered the battlefields. The Armies were retreating in disorder; the same Armies that, only a year ago, had captured Lutsk, Brody-Stanislavov, Chernovetz in their triumphal progress . . . were retreating before the same Austro-German troops that only a year ago had been completely defeated and had strewn with fugitives the plains of Volynia, Galicia and Bukovina, leaving hundreds of thousands of prisoners in our hands.


http://alphahistory.com/russianrevolution/july-days/
>News of the offensive was met with anger and hostility in the cities. Perhaps aware of the oncoming crisis, the Provisional Government’s coalition ministry collapsed, triggered by the resignation of prime minister Lvov and all four Kadet ministers. News of the disastrous offensive, along with the implosion of the government, sparked unrest in Petrograd not dissimilar to the events of February. On the evening of July 3rd, street demonstrations and riots involving thousands of factory workers broke out in the capital. The following day they were joined by mutinous soldiers from the Petrograd garrison, as well as sailors from the nearby island fortress of Kronstadt (they had earlier taken control of their base, murdering more than 40 officers and establishing their own form of direct democracy). Estimates of their numbers vary: some sources suggest there were 100,000 involved, others more than a half-million. 


http://www.richthofen.com/ww1sum2/
>By 1917, the Russian Army's officer corps was increasingly demoralized by the poor progress of the fighting. Though grossly outnumbered, the Germans had proven to be dangerous and cunning opponents, and the Russian royal family's unfortunate intervention in affairs did not improve anything. The repeated catastrophes suffered by Russian field armies squelched what patriotism had existed three years earlier, slowly allowing the entire governing system to fall apart. By March of that year, some Army units began ignoring their orders, a situation made worse as growing Communist rebel groups exaggerated reports of minor events such as the revolt of a Russian Guard depot formation at Petrograd (this famous mutiny was carried out by trainees and depot troops, not by fully trained Imperial Guardsmen). After the Tsar abdicated his throne that same month, a provisional government was formed with Alexander Kerensky at its head. He made a short-lived attempt to uphold Allied obligations by putting General Brusilov in command of another offensive against the German Southern Army in Galicia. But despite his best efforts, Brusilov's 1917 offensive only cleared a few mutinous Austrian formations out of the way before running into the brick wall of German general's Hoffman and Hutier, who first held off, then counter-attacked the hesitant Russian troops. This was the last straw for the Imperial Russian Army, which virtually disintegrated as open civil war swept like a wave across Russia.


https://weaponsandwarfare.com/2016/02/25/the-battle-of-riga-september-1917/
>The Battle of Riga -September 1917

>At the Moscow Conference General Korniloff had uttered grave warning to the effect that if the Russian army did not help him to hold the shore of the Gulf of Riga, the road to Petrograd would be opened wide. Whilst he was speaking, the Germans were preparing their attack. Great naval activity started in the Gulf of Riga on September 1st. On the same day, after a strong artillery preparation, the German land forces crossed the River Dvina in the region of Uxkull, south-east of Riga, occupied Kupfer-Mammer, and developed their success in a northerly direction. The next day the enemy assumed the offensive in the region of the Mitau road. Towards the evening they succeeded in penetrating the Russian positions on the river Jagel, in the region of Melmager-Skripto. Some Russian detachments left their position and retired to the north. This caused a general order to be given to abandon the Riga region, and the Germans were left in possession. The city was evacuated on Monday, September 3rd, after it had been shelled by the Germans for a few hours.

>Later details of the fall indicated that although some Russian detachments had fled before the oncoming enemy, others of the Russian troops behaved with great gallantry. They fought well, but were finally compelled to retreat owing to the superior numbers of the enemy’s forces, and his preponderance in artillery. The Petrograd reports mentioned that the fortifications and bridges of the town were blown up before the retirement.


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/aug/22.htm
>V. I. Lenin

>Letter Over the Publication of “Leaflet on the Capture of Riga”

>Written after August 22 (September 4), 1917

>This leaflet cannot, of course, be published legally, but everything must be done to have it published illegally.

>... I am aware that the sluggishness of our Bolsheviks is   great and that it will take a great deal of effort to secure the publication of illegal leaflets. But I shall go on insisting because those are the demands of life, the demands of the movement.

>We must issue illegally free leaflets and handbills which are not curtailed and which speak out at the top of their voice. They should be signed: “A group of persecuted Bolsheviks”.

>>Workers, soldiers and all working people!

>>The enemy troops have taken Riga. We have suffered another heavy defeat. The incredible calamities inflicted on the people by the war are being aggravated and dragged out.

>>Why is the war being dragged out? The reason is still a division of the spoils between the capitalist brigands ...The Kerensky government, with the participation and support of the Mensheviks and the S.R.s, has been brazenly cheating the people, lulling them with empty talk about their desire for peace, talk which is not binding in any way, while actually dragging out the predatory war

>>...Tens and hundreds of thousands of people have died in the offensive, which the Kerensky, Menshevik, and S.R. government started in June. Tens and hundreds of thousands will die in the protracted war, so long as the people continue to tolerate such a government.

>>Only a workers’ government can save the country. It alone will not cheat the people, but will immediately offer to all countries precise, clear-cut and fair peace terms.

>>The bourgeoisie has been trying to intimidate the people and create a panic, in an effort to get the ignorant people to believe that peace cannot be offered right away, as this would mean “losing Riga” and so on. That is cheating the people.


https://weaponsandwarfare.com/2016/02/25/the-battle-of-riga-september-1917/
>Once in possession of the town, German submarines entered the Gulf of Riga, and commenced shelling the villages along the shore. Meanwhile the Russian army fell back north, and was followed by a rapid advance of the Germans.


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1915/jul/26.htm
>V. I.   Lenin
>The Defeat of One’s Own Government in the Imperialist War

>To desire Russia’s defeat, Trotsky writes, is “an uncalled-for and absolutely unjustifiable concession to the political methodology of social-patriotism, which would replace the revolutionary struggle against the war and the conditions causing it, with an orientation—highly arbitrary in the present conditions—towards the lesser evil” (Nashe Slovo No. 105). 

>...The phrase-bandying Trotsky has completely lost his bearings on a simple issue. It seems to him that to desire Russia’s defeat means desiring the victory of Germany. ...Semkovsky (an opportunist who is more useful to the working class than all the others, thanks to his naively frank reiteration of bourgeois wisdom) blurted out the following: “This is nonsense, because either Germany or Russia can win” (Izvestia No. 2).

>Take the example of the Paris Commune. France was defeated by Germany but the workers were defeated by Bismarck and Thiers! Had Bukvoyed and Trotsky done a little thinking, they would have realised that they have adopted the viewpoint on the war held by *governments and the bourgeoisie*

>...A revolution in wartime means civil war; the conversion of a war between governments into a civil war is, on the one hand, facilitated by military reverses ("defeats") of governments; on the other hand, one cannot actually strive for such a conversion without thereby facilitating defeat.


https://books.google.com/books?id=I1LtBAAAQBAJ&pg=PT125
>THE FALL OF RIGA

>...On 1 September, 1917, German artillery fired more than 20,000 shells, most of them gas shells, without warning. The attack struck Russian defenders like a bolt of lightning, catching them completely unprepared. German stormtroops soon began to cross the rivers and streams around Riga in specially designed boats, establishing bridgeheads and directing the fire of more conventional artillery to prevent Russia counterattacks.

>...the Germans were able to land nine divisions of troops across the Dvina River in just 48 hours. Once they did so, the Russian defenders knew the battle was lost and made quick plans to evacuate a now indefensible Riga. Setting some buildings on fire to, the Russians evacuated as many men and supplies as they could amid scenes of chaos and sheer panic. German artillery pounded the city and many of the bridges leading east in the hopes of capturing as many Russian soldiers as possible. By the third day of the operation, German forces had entered parts of Riga, and by day four they had complete control of the city and its port.

>...The Germans estimated their causalities at 4,200 and Russian casualties more than 25,000. The Russians also lost 250 of their precious artillery pieces, leaving five Russian divisions without significant artillery support. Many smaller Russian units simply melted away in the face of the attack, underscoring the essential morale problems of the army. The Russian officer crops tried everything it could think of to stem the tide of desertion. Commanders ordered deserters shot on sight, tried to create their own storm-troop detachments and even formed a special all-female battalion. The Russian soldier, however, had begun to give up the cause.


Following the the German counter offensive and General Kornilov's coup, which pit Russian soldiers against Red Guards and ended with most of the soldiers deserting or joining the Bolsheviks, the Russian army's demoralization and the provisional government's dysfunction reached a zenith. On October 24, 1917, the Lenin sprang his coup:


http://spartacus-educational.com/RUSnovemberR.htm
>On 24th October, 1917, Lenin wrote a letter to the members of the Central Committee: "The situation is utterly critical. It is clearer than clear that now, already, putting off the insurrection is equivalent to its death. With all my strength I wish to convince my comrades that now everything is hanging by a hair, that on the agenda now are questions that are decided not by conferences, not by congresses (not even congresses of soviets), but exclusively by populations, by the mass, by the struggle of armed masses… No matter what may happen, this very evening, this very night, the government must be arrested, the junior officers guarding them must be disarmed, and so on… History will not forgive revolutionaries for delay, when they can win today (and probably will win today), but risk losing a great deal tomorrow, risk losing everything."

>...Leon Trotsky supported Lenin's view and urged the overthrow of the Provisional Government. On the evening of 24th October, orders were given for the Bolsheviks to occupy the railway stations, the telephone exchange and the State Bank. The Smolny Institute became the headquarters of the revolution and was transformed into a fortress. Trotsky reported that the "chief of the machine-gun company came to tell me that his men were all on the side of the Bolsheviks".

>The following day the Red Guards surrounded the Winter Palace. Inside was most of the country's Cabinet, although Kerensky had managed to escape from the city. The palace was defended by Cossacks, some junior army officers and the Woman's Battalion. At 9 p.m. The Aurora and the Peter and Paul Fortress began to open fire on the palace. Little damage was done but the action persuaded most of those defending the building to surrender. The Red Guards, led by Vladimir Antonov-Ovseenko, now entered the Winter Palace.


The revolutionaries met little resistance. With a handful of men and 18 million corpses behind them, the Bolsheviks walked into the Winter Palace.